Nov. 17, 1912 Dearest: Your Uncle says you are a splendid looking fellow an
Nov. 17, 1912 Dearest: Your Uncle says you are a splendid looking fellow am

fine one. "And you are his Mother", he added. "I am his proud and Mother" I
fine one. "And you are his Mother", he added. "I am his proud and Mother" I

said. To be justly a proud and happy Mother is to my thi the highest pinnacle
said. To be juatly a proud and happy Mother is to my thj the highest pinnacle

of joy that a woman can attain. Auf Wiedersehen, Beloved Mim Tuesday Night,
of joy that a woman can attain. Auf Wiedersehen, Beloved Mim Tuesday Night,

Nov. 26, 1912 Darling Gopher - This voyage is almost over; - We are due in Na
Nov. 26, 1912 Darling Gopher — This voyage is almost over; - We are due in Na

in the morning at the crude hour of six, though we don’t have to ge until
in the morning at the crude hour of six, though we don't have to ge until

considerably later. But, presumably, there will be bumpings bangings and
considerably later. But, presumably, there will be bumpings hangings and

yellings from five on so that sleep will be wooed in v The voyage has been a
yellings from five on so that sleep will be wooed in v The voyage has been a

good one as voyages go. This steamer is very and most remarkably steady; the
good one as voyages go. This steamer is very and most remarkably steady; the

service is excellent, willing and m courteous; and as for the Table you could
service is excellent, Willing and m< courteous; and as for the Table you could

stuff until you burst if y were so disposed. The menus have included
stuff until you burst if x were so disposed. The menus have included

everything the plain Amer has been used to from infancy, as well as everything
everything the plain Ame] has been used to from infancy, as Well as everything

you never heard from "Spit-cake" to "Lobskans with dilled cucumber." After you
you never hearc from "Spit-cake" to_"Lobskans with dilled cucumber." After you

bade us goodbye that day, which seems so long ago, we retu to our sumptuous
bade us goodbye that day, which seems so long ago, we rate to our sumptuous

stateroom to find it filling up with baskets of fru, boxes of flowers,
stateroom to find it filling up with baskets of fru boxes of flowers,

letters, telegrams and books from many of those to whom we have endeared
letters, telegrams and books from many of those to Whom we have endeared

ourselves. One wondrous basket was from Nelso and Wallace, and a box of
ourselves. One wondrous basket was from Noise and Wallace, and a box of

chrysanthemums as big as cabbages with ste a yard long was from . We were an
Chrysanthemums as big as cabbages with ste a yard long was from . We were an

hour late i sailing and didn’t start till twelve. Our one disappointment was
hour late 1 sailing.and didn't start till twelve. Our one disappointment was

the thick weather which prevented our hav anything more than very
the thick weather which prevented our hav anything more than very

unsatisfactory glimpses of the Azores. But Oh! Gibraltar! The Sister-Kitty
unsatisfactory glimpses of the Azores. But OhliGibraltar! The Sister—Kitty

says she has written you all about but I doubt if even her fluent pen can give
says she has written you all about but I doubt if even her fluent pen can give

you a more than faint id of the splendour, the grimness and the charm of
you more than a faint id of the splendour, the grimness and the charm of

that wonderful spot. We did so hanker for you, - and Jones was the first to
that wonderful spot. We did so hanker for you, — and Jones was the first to

say it aloud, how much he wished you were there. Yesterday our first day in
sav it aloud, how much he wished you were theta Yesterday our first day in

the Mediterranean was perfectly beautiful a smooth pale blue sea, and the
the Mediterranean was perfectly beautiful a smooth pale blue sea, and the

splendid almost sinister coast of Af very near, with mountains so high there
splendid almost sinister coast of Af: very near, With mountains so high there

was snow upon their summits. was after dark when we anchored before Algiers
was snow upon their summits. was after dark when we anchored before Algiers

last evening and Cous Theodore quite refused to let D. and me go ashore even
last evening and Cousf Theodore quite refused to let D. and me go ashore even

with the peer-less Jones. "They are everyone of them beasts in that town" he
with the peer- less Jones. "They are everyone of them beasts in that town" he

said shortly, "There’s no knowing what they might say to you". "Not with me
said shortly, FThere's no knowing what they might say to you". "Not with me

there, sir," said Jones. But he wouldn’t let us go. However the flashing
there, sir," said Jones. But he wouldn't let us go. However the flashing

lights of the town near the water and the soft radiance in moonlight of tier
lights of the town near the water and the soft radiance in ' moonlight of tier

upon tier of dim, white, closely packed buildings ing to the crest of the hill
upon tier of dim, white, closely packed buildings ing to the crest of the hill

was a lovely spectacle from the deck of ship. Today the Mediterranean has been
was a lovely spectacle from the deck of' ship. Today the Mediterranean has been

too choppy for perfect beauty but we’ve had Sardinia with us most of the time
too choppy for perfect beaut) but we've had Sardinia with us most of the time

with its rocky mount ranges, fit home for hordes of bandits. Baedeker says
with its rocky mount? ranges, fit home for hordes of bandits. Baedecker says .

Dear Cousin T. remarks at intervals what a fine fellow you are, and
Dear Cousin T. remarks at intervals what a fine fellow you are, and

painstakingly explains again and again how it happened that he did not
painstakingly explains again and again how it happened that he did not

recognize you. He is perfectly devoted to Doris and I am tickled almost to
recognize you. He is perfectly devoted to Doris and I am tickled almost to

death. He said the other day that with us two in Egypt he knew he’d have a
death. He said the other day that with us two in Egypt he knew he'd have a

charming time. "I’ve sometimes had such dreadful people", he added! I do so
charming time. "I've sometimes had such dreadful people", he added: I do so

hope you can find time to go to see Kimmy. Please do if you possibly can,
hope you can find time to go to see Kimmy. Please do if you possibly can,

Dearest. I’m so afraid the memory of this family may grow dim if he doesn’t
Dearest. I'm so afraid the memory of his family may grow dim if he doesn't

see any of us for six months, and I really could not bear that. Did Doris tell
see any of us for six months, and I really could not bear that. Did Doris tell

you of our wonderful presents from Mrs. Eells? For D. a check for 250 francs
you of our wonderful presents from Mrs. Eells? For D. a check for 250 francs

to buy something for herself; and for me a beautiful wooden box with lock and
to buy something for herself; and for me a beautiful wooden box with lock and

key, filled with the most delightful toilet articles, exquisite soaps,
key, filled with the most delightful toilet articles, exquisite soaps,

colognes, bath salts etc. etc. Well, Beloved, goodbye for this time. I’m
colognes, bath salts etc. etc. Well,.Beloved, goodbye for this time. I'm

wondering when my postal from Gibraltar will reach you. My love to Jack and
wondering when my postal from Gibraltar will reach you. My love to Jack and

Wilson Foss. Endless, endless love to you and every blessing on your dear
Wilson Foss. Endless, endless love to you and every blessing on your dear

head. Your very Mim The Mediterranean Norddeutscher Lloyd, Bremen Dampfer
head. Your very own Mim The Mediterranean ‘ Norddeutscher Lloyd, Bremen Dampfer

"Prinz Heinrich" Sunday Dec. 1, 1912 Darling Gopher - The day we got to
"Prinz Heinrich" Sunday Dec. 1, 1912 Darling Gopher — I The day we got to

Naples was simply heavenly. I posted you a letter from there the minute I
Naples was simply heavenly. I posted you a letter from there the minute I

reached the Hotel. Also I posted 23 other letters and notes that I’d written
reached the Hotel. Also I posted 23 other letters and notes that I'd written

on the steamer. As we were driving from the steamer to our hostelry, the Grand
on the steamer. As we were driving from the steamer to our h05telry, the Grand

Hotel, Doris and I grinning with delight over everything we saw, our carriage
Hotel, Doris and I grinning With delight over everything we saw, our carriage

was held up by what at first seemed to be two leaping, shouting brigands who
was held up by what at first seemed to be two leaping, shouting brigands who

turned out to be Harry Burton and Jim Whittaker. I think I told you on my post
turned out to be Harry Burton and Jim Whittaker. I think I told you on my post

card from Naples that Jim came all the way from Florence to meet us. And
card from Naples that Jim came all the way from Florence to meet us. And

Giulio Tedeschi sent word that he would have given his sou to come also, but
Giulio Tedeschi sent word that he would have given his sou to come also, but

couldn’t leave his sick mother. We had a perfect time that first day - it was
couldn't leave his sick mother. We had a perfect time that first day — it was

so beautiful, and I’m wondering why I hated Naples so that long ago time when
so beautiful, and I'm wondering why I hated Naples so that long ago time when

I was a girl. After we had seen our quarters at the hotel, we all, except for
I was a girl. After we had seen our quarters at the hotel, we all, except 

Connie E., went driving along a wonderful mountain road above the city to
Connie -., went driving along a wonderful mountain road above the city to

Posolippo, with ecstatic views. In the afternoon while naps were being taken
Posolippo, with ecstatic views. In the afternoon while naps were being taken

by the Elders, Jim and Doris and I went to the Aquarium, stopping on our way
by the Elders, Jim and Doris and I went to the Aquarium, stopping on our Way

by the seawall to see a lot of fishermen drawing in a seine. They did it with
by the seaWall to see a lot of fishermen drawing in a seine. They did ~it with

a rhythmic stamping of the feet and wild shouts and as much enthusiasm as
a rythmic stamping of the feet and wild shouts and as much en— thusiasm as

though they did not do it twice every day of their lives. The Aquarium is
though they did not do it twice every day of their lives. The Aquarium is

wonderful - such extraordinary denizens of the deep, and all from the
wonderful — such extraordinary denizens of the deep, and all from the

Mediterranean. Later in the afternoon we all went to Bertolini’s for tea.
Mediterranean. Later in the afternoon we all went to Bert011nl'5 for tea.

First you drive zigzagging up and up a mountainous road. Then you leave your
First you drive zigzagging up and up a mountain- OUS T°“d' The“ You leave your

carriage and walk by means of a tunnel into the heart of the mountain. There
carriage and Walk by means of n tunnel into the heart of the mountain. There

you take a lift and go up for what seems like a mile, whereupon you step out 
you take a lift and go up for what seams a mile whereupon you ste out ' .

on a verandah that seems like a terrace in the skies,
on a verand.h th.t l k XX a terrace 1n the th the Eity far below, —qthe Beyfeﬁiih 1 e skies,

the city far below, - the bay, with Vesuvius to the left and Capri, the
‘8 i in the near distance 1 1 . Vesuvius to the left and Capri, the

Beautiful, in the near distance guarding the entrance to the harbor; and, to
Beautiful, guarding the entrance to the harbor; and, to

the right a dull red classic sunset burning behind a sloping row of cypresses
the right a dull red classic sunset burning behind a sloping row of cypresses

and pines. It was so beautiful it was hard to believe it true. The next day
and pines. d to believe it true. The next day

was hor weather and the only thing of interest that we did was the museum,
Was ho, e did Was the museum, to tiful it Was hur he only thing of

to which Jim and Doris and I went in the morning. But there is never-failing
Which Jim and Doris and I Went t 

amusement from the windows of the Grand, which is close to the water, with a
 from the windows of the Grand, failing amusemen the water, with a

constant drilling of soldiers in the street by day, and minstrelsy by night.
constant drilling of soldiers i and minstrelsy by night.

We boarded this steamer at about 10:30 Friday A.M. in the midst of the wildest
~ 1 s steamer 0 Friday A.M. in the midst of th& Wildest

confusion (I fancy it’s always that way in this voluble and excitable land).
confusi 't's aIWays that way in this voluble r E exoitable land).

Jim came down to say goodbye and then betook himself to his train. We were to
Jim cam say goodbye and then betook himselﬂ to his train. We were ‘led

have sailed at 12 but were two hours late because of a gruesome accident.
 at 12 but were tw0 hours late 1 because of a grue 

They were lowering a huge bale of sacks of potatoes into the hold when it
 lowering a huge bale of ed a guiding hand and sacks of potatoes

escaped a guiding hand and smashed a poor man to death against the side of
i smashed a poor mnn interest that w in the morning. re

the steamer. As we sailed out past Capri and the coast of Italy unfolded
is never— se to 1 day, But the which is clo weather

"where the waves and mountains meet", it was a sight of breathless beauty. We
 and t n the street by We boarded thi at about

were, unfortunately, asleep when we passed through the Straits of Mess Today
10:3 1 1 ed "where tho st of Italy unfold W e

we have had a dim, dim glimpse of Crete, and it’s getting deliciously warm. We
\ it was a sight of breath ssed thrOUgh th f Crete, and

are due in Alexandria about noon tomorrow, and should be in Cairo in time for
As we saile ves and mountain unfortunately, had a dim, we were,

dinner. Harry Burton is too amusing for words. He is a most delightful
Today We have ously warm. be in Cairo He is a mos Would

hard to realize in Naples, (with nothing at all to mark the day except the
hard to realize, f you at Pom (with nothing at all to mark the day except the

many, many things we have to be thankful for), that in our native land, Turkey
many, thankful for), 've land, Turkey ‘ ng supreme. benediction. d many‘ I thought 0

and Cranberry were reigning supreme. I meant to stop this letter on the last
in Naples, things we hav and Cranberry e to be were reigni the last

sheet with my benediction. N I must, in order to write to your grandmother. 
sheet wi . ite to your grandmother. H

Your loving, loving Mim. Please write to your grandmother at Christmas time.
Your loving, loving Mim. r at Christmas time.

It’s possible sh may be in Indianapolis at the time, but
It‘s possible 5N Will alWays Please write to your grandmothe may be in Indianapolis at the time, but

"Gambier, Ohio" will always reach her. The Egyptian Hotels Ltd Cairo
"Gambler, Ohio" reach her. The Egyptian Hotels Ltd Cairo

Shepheard’s Hotel & Ghezireh Palace 5 December, 1912 Darling Gopher - I
h Palace ‘ 5 Hotel & Ghezire 5 December, 1912 't give if you

don’t know what I wouldn’t give if you were her you’d love it so, and you
were herf ct have the patience to read a quar‘ 1 tion. I mailed you

wouldn’t have the patience to read a quar of it if I should even try to give 
I don't know w P . so this makes my th Darling Gopher - ouldn you‘d love it

 you a description. I mailed you letter form Naples and another from
so, and you w of it ii I should even try ’ Naples and another from

Entering Alexandria was one of the most beautiful things I ever did,- and the
Entering Alexandria was one of the most beautiful things I ever did,— and the

scenes on the wharf - the strange tribes and peoples, the wonderful colors,
scenes on the wharf - the strange tribes and peoples, the won— derful colors,

the turbans, the fezes, the Turkish trousers and gold embroidery, the superb
the turbans, the fezes, the Turkish trousers and gold embroidery, the superb

figures of the Arabs in their long straight robes, the vociferations and
figures of the Arabs in their long straight robes, the vociferations and

gesticulations, - it was all a mad and wholly delightful confusion. None of us
gesticulations, — it was all a mad and wholly delightful confusion. None of us

ever have to look after a single piece of our forty-something pieces of
ever have to look after a single piece of our forty-something pieces of

luggage, except one small black bag with Cousin Emma’s jewels. Jones and
luggage, except one small black bag with Cousin Emma's jeWels. Jones and

Amelie look after everything, and we simply sail along empty-handed and take
Amelie look after everything, and We simply sail along empty—handed and take

possession of comfortable train-compartments reserved in large red letters for
possession of comfortable train—compartments reserved in large red letters for

"Davis Pasha". Cousin Theodore has been coming to this hotel for 20 years so
“Davis Pasha". Cousin TheodOre has been coming to this hotel for 20 years so

we are a sort of Royal Party here and are the recipients of more salaaming and
we are a sort of Royal Party here and are the recipients of more salaaming and

devotion that anything less than Royalty often gets. It was late Monday
devotion than anything less than Royalty often gets. It was late Monday

evening when we reached here, and we vanished at once in the gorgeous suite
evening when we reached here, and we vanished at once in- the gorgeous suite

reserved for us. But the next morning as we were standing on the terrace
reserved for us. But the next morning as we were standing on the terrace

waiting for our motor car, and watching monkeys and cobras and mongooses
waiting for our motor car, and watching monkeys and cobras and mongooses

performing on the sidewalk, who should fall upon us from the rear but Mrs.
performing on the sidewalk, who should fall upon us from the rear but Mrs.

Tonzalin and Charlotte. We have been to the museum and have seen the wonderful
Tonzalin and Charlotte. We have been to the museum and have seen the wonderful

Theodore M. Davis Room with all its marvels and beauties, and have been
Theodore M. Davis Room With all its marvels and beauties, and have been

presented (Doris and I) to Sir Gaston Maspero who presented us with the
presented (Doris and I) to Sir Gaston Maspero who presented us with the

freedom of the Museum, and gave us each a grey and gold permit "de visiter
freedom of the Museum, and gave us each a grey and gold permit "de visiter

tous les monuments, fermes ou enclos de la Haute-Egypte." We have visited our
tous les monuments, fermes ou enclos de la Haute—Egypte." We have viSited our

dahabeah, the Beduin, twice and are wild about it. Once, when the Elders were
dahabeah, the Beduin, twice and are wild about it. Once, when the Elders were

napping, Harry Burton, D. & I paid a delirious visit to the native bazaars and
napping, Harry Burton, D. & I paid a delirious visit to the native bazaars and

saw more queer things in an hour than in all our live put together before. We
saw more queer things in an hour than in all our live put together before. 'We

have been to the Pyramids!!! (Haven’t seen the Sphynx as yet.) We have motored
have been to the Pyramids!!! (Haven't seen the sphynx as yet.) We have motored

out and out into the desert until the whole world seemed made of grey and
out and out into the desert until the Whole world seemed made of grey and

shifting sand in desolate sweeps, high ridges and deep hollows. We’ve been to
shifting sand in desolate sweeps, high ridges and deep hOIIOWS. We've been to

the Zoo, - one of the nicest ones I ever saw. We've been to the Citadel, and
the Zoo, — one of the nicest ones 1 ever saw. We’ve been to the Citadel, and

have entered the wonderful Mosque of Mohammed Ali with sacred yellow slippers
have enterei the wonderful Mosque of Nohammed Ali with sacred yellow slippers

as big as barges on our profane tootsies. But after all it is the strange and
as big as barges on our profane tootsies. But after all it is the strange and

crowded and kaleidoscopic street life which is the most enthralling part of
crowded and kaleidoscopic street life which is the most enthralling part of

Cairo to us so far. Such startling sights which no one but such as we even
Cairo to us so far. Such startling sights which no one but such as we even

turn to look at. Doris could ride through Cairo on a camel and not begin to
torn to look at. Doris could ride through Cairo on a camel and not begin to

attract the attention she does in New Haven on a horse. A splendid Arab in a
attract the attention she does in New Haven on a horse. 'A splendid Arab in a

long straight robe of heavenly blue strides across a thoroughfare with three
long straight robe of heavenly'blue strides across a thoroughfare with three

dried crocodiles under his arm and 615 Orange St. is the only thing that
dried crocodiles under his arm and 615 Orange St. is the only thing that

notices him. It’s all of it perfectly gorgeous. But we hanker to hear from
notices him. It's all of it perfectly gorgeous. But we banker to hear from

you. I’ve had a letter from Adeline, one fro Grandmother, and one from Katie
you. I've had a letter from Adeline, one frc Grandmother, and one from Katie

from Cooraclare, Ireland; and D. has had missives from Marion and Clara.
from Cooraclare, Ireland; and D. has had missives from Marion and Clara.

Perhaps the next steamer will bring one from you. I omitted to send a message
Perhaps the next steamer will bring one from you. I omitted to send a message

- a Christmas message for Clara to enclose with my present to you. But you
- a Christmas message for Clara to enclose with my present to you. But you_know

know - or ought - what oceans and oceans of love go with it. God bless my boy
— or ought - what oceans and oceans of love go with it. God bless my boy

and keep him safe. A Merry Christmas and A Truly Happy New Year. Your loving
and keep him safe. A Merry Christmas and A Truly Happy New Year. Your loving

Shepheard’s Hotel Cairo 9 December, 1912 Darling Gopher - The cable
10 Shepheard's Hotel Cairo ? 9 December, 1912 1:121” Darling Gopher - The eagle

which John sent me telling of his father’s death was five days late in being
which John sent me telling of his father's death was five days late in being

delivered to me. I cabled at once to Auntie Paige, and of course followed that
delivered to me. I cabled at once to Auntie Paige. and of course followed that

message immediately by a lett If they telegraphed you I do hope you did the
message immediately by_ a lett If they telegraphed you I do hopbyou did the

proper thing. I cannot he feeling very anxious about Paige. She has been under
proper thing. I cannot hé feeling very anxiOUS about Paige. She has been under

such a tremendous strain for so long that I’m afraid under the sudden
such a tremendgug strain for solong that I'm afraid under the sudden

cessation of it she may go to pieces. Of course you will go to see her at once
cessation of it She? may go to pieces. Of course you will go to see her at once

in Clevelan and I beg you to write me at once all about her. I hope Winifred
in Clevelnﬁ~ and I beg you to Write me at once all about her. I hope hinifred

has taken the baby to Cleveland. Nothing in the world could divert Paige or
h:|5 taken the baby to Cleveland. Nothing in the world codd divert Paige Or

help her as much as that baby. Your letter of the 21 Nov. reached me Saturday
help her as much as that baby. Your letter of the 21 Nov. reached me Saturday

the 7th and rejoiced me through and through. I’m also glad that you have
the 7th and rejoiced me? through and through. I'm also glad that you hzxve

decided to live at th Hall - if it is not going to interfere with your work
decided to live at th Hall — if it is not going to interfere with your work

and keep you up too late at night. As to your surgical operation, I do not
and keep you up too late at night. As to your surgical operation, I do not

anticipate any trouble at all from that. Nevertheless I shall want a line of
anticip: Q any trouble at all from that. Nevertheless I shall want a line immedQ

immediately - sooner than you will feel like writing it; so arrange with the
tely — sooner than you Will feel like writing it; so arrange with the

doctor or one of your friends to write me at once. If it were a more serious
doctor or one of your friends to write me at once. If it Here a more serious

thing I should, of course, want a cable. We go on living in the Arabian
thing I should, of course, want a cable. 'W'e go on living in the Arabian

Nights. We had tea yesterday afternoon on the dahabeah, with the most
Nights. he had tea yesterday afternoon on the dahabeah, with the most

wonderful lights on the river-that haunting river Nile; white walled
wonderful lights on the river- that haun ing river Nile; white \:alled

palaces, backed by towering palm trees, gleaming out on the opposite shore; a
palaces, backed by towering palm trees, gleaming out on the opposite shore; a

fleet of boats with their beautiful, slanting sails moving so slowly that
fleet of boats with their beauti ful, slanting sails moving so slowly that

they seemed not to move at al until suddenly you found they had vanished
they seemed not to move at n until suddenly you found they had vanished

around a bend. Before our guests arrived we were immensely amused by a little
around a bend. Before our guests arrived we were immensely amused by a little

scene enacted on bank to which the Beduin is tied. We have a snow-white cock
scene enacted on bank to which the Beduin is tied. We have a snow—white cock

and three hens, a gorgeous drake and three ducks which we take with us when we
.wnd three hens, a gorgeous drake and three ducks which we take hith us when me

set sail, and which made the voyage up the river last year. The ducks were off
set sail, and which made the voyage up the river last year. The ducks were off

visiting a neighboring dahabeah yesterday when we arrived, but when whistled
visiting a neighboring dahabeah yesterday when me arrived bd when whistled

for came paddling up for dear life. In the meantime the cock and hens had
for came paddling up for dear life. In the meantime the cock and hens had

wandered along the bank till they arrived at the pla close to the boat, which
Wandered along the bank till they arrived at the plw close to the boat, Which

the drake regards as his own domain. Instantly the drake waddled out
the drake regards as his own domain. Instanj -0... a-..=uu. wmwu‘m‘e-ﬁ‘nm‘hﬂ L the drake waddled out

of the water and made for the cock, dabbing at hi legs until he drove him off.
of the Water and made for the cock, d: bbing legs until he drove him off.

In his pride of victory and the attitude he struck he really looked like
In his pride of victory and the attitude he struck he really leoked like

Napoleon. Our guests were Prof. Sayle, an Oxford Don, explorer and scientist,
Napoleon. Rug, ests were Prof. Sayle, an Oxford Don, explorer and scientist,

Artin Pasha, an Armenian archaeologist of distinction, and an Egyptian
r 1 asha, an Armenian archaeologist of distinction, and an Egyptian

gentleman, Claudius Bey, whose hair turned snow white a few years ago when
gentleman, Claudius Bey, whose hair turned snow white a few years ago when

upon going on board a steamer, just landed in Alexandria, to meet his wife -
upon going on board a steamer, just landed at Alexandria, to meet his Wife —

he found her lying in her stateroom with her throat cut. She had been murdered
he found her lying in her stateroom with her throat cut. She had been murdered

by a steward. I talked with Prof. Sayle for some time, or rather I listened
by a steWard. I talked with Prof. Sayle for some time, or rather I listened

while he talked. He told me some inside history about Gordon, which was
while he talked. He told me some inside history about Gordon, which was

absorbingly interesting, - particularly so to me as Gordon has always been
absorb ingly interesting, - particularly so to me as Gordon has always been

on of my heroes. We had expected to move onto the dahabeah today and sail
0 of my heroes. We ha d expected to move onto the dahabeah today and seﬁ

tomorrow but we’ve been delayed a day. Not that I care - for I’ve not begun to
tomorrow but we've been delayed a day. Not that I care — for I've not begun to

Harry Burton and I went to see the Blue Mosque, -a beautiful, half ruined
Harry Burton and I went to see the Blue Mosque, -a beautiful, half ruinec

structure, parts of whose walls are covered with superb Persian tiles in blue
structure, parts of whose walls are covered with superb Persian tiles in blue

and white. Hundreds of young men and boys were sitting about in groups on the
and white. Hundreds of young men and boys were sitting about in groups on the

floor reciting the Koran aloud. The weather is heavenly. We wear our winter
floor reciting the Koran aloud. The weather is heavenly We wear our winter

clothes and Cousin Theodore declares it cold, but I am basking in warmth,
clothes and Cousin TheodOre declares it cold but I. am basking in warmth,

except in the evening. Give my dear love to Mr. and Mrs. Eells and the young
except in the evening. , _Give my dear love to Mr. and Mrs. Bells and the young

people. The Sister-Kittie is in high favor and I am very happy. A Happy, Happy
people. The Sister—Kittie is in high favor and I am very happy. A Happy, Happy

New Year to you my darling. Your loving Mim Monday, 16 December, 1912 On the
New Year to you my darling. Your loving Mim . Monday, 16 December, 1912 On the

Nile somewhere between Roda and Asyut, and about 180 miles from Cairo. DAHABYA
Nile somewhere between Roda and Asyut, and about 180 miles from Cairo. DAHABYA

BEDUIN EGYPT Darling Gopher - This is the best paper and I shall not use it
BEDUIN EGV?T Darling Gopher - This is the best paper and I shall not use it

often in writing to you, but I am giving you a treat as long as this is my
often in writing to you, but am giviﬁg you a treat as long as this is my

first letter to you from the boat. I’d give anything if you were here. It is
first letter to you from the boat. I'd give anything if you were here. It is

impossible to convey by written description any adequate idea of t
impossible to convey by written description any adequate idea of t

incomparable river and the scenes through which it winds. And how it winds! We
incomparable river and the scenes through which it winds. And how it winds! We

almost ... the compass in our meandering. And it would take a whole day’s
almost ... the compass in our meandering. And it would take a whole day's

writing, and result in a letter you would carry about with you - possibly -
Writing, and result in a letter you Would carry about with you - possibly -

but never read, if I tried to describe the variety of scenery. The principal
but never read, if I tried to describe the variety of scenery. The principal

towns are on the west shore, and it is on that shore that the railroad from
towns are on the west shore, and it is on that shore that the railroad from

Cairo to Luxor runs, and there is enough of ceaseless interest on that side to
Cairo to Luxor runs, and there is enough of ceaseless interest on that side to

hold you spellbound from the cool early morning through the glowing day tothe
hold you spellbound fiom the cool early morning through the glowing day tothe

moonlit dusk. But it’s nothing to the Eastern Shore with its desert
moonlit dusk. But it's no— thing to the Eastern Shore with its desert

stretches, its cultivated str and terraces, its palm groves, its native
stretches, its cultivated str and terraces, its palm groves, its native

villages so absolutely fascinating that each one fills me with delight, some
villages so absolutely fasci— nating that each one fills me With delight, some

of them are are walled abou and those always have towering palms growing
of them are walled abou and those alWays have towering palms growing

within the walls; the unwalled ones are sometimes hard to distinguish from the
within the walls; the unwalled ones are sometimes hard to distinguish from the

desert sand out of which they rise and the desert hills into which they melt
desert sand out of Which they rise a.d the desert hills into which they melt

without one speck of anything green about them. And always on that magic
without one speck of anything green about them. And always on that magic

Eastern Shore the fierce Arabian hills which follow us all the way to Luxor,
astern Shore the fierce Arabian hills which follow us all the way to Luxor,

sometimes far in the distance, sometimes in the foreground. Absolutely bleak
semetimes far in the distance, sometimes in the foreground. Ab— solutely bleak

and bare, of the strangest shapes, long stretches of them where surely no
and bare, of the strangest shapes, long stretches of them where surely no

human foot has ever been, then long stretches where they have been quarried
human foot has ever been, then long stretches where they have been quarried

for building stone, or tunneled for tombs. Yesterday morning we sailed close
for buﬂding stone, or tunnelled for tombs. Yesterday 'morning we sailed close

to the foot of the gigantic limestone cliffs that rose precipitously out of
to the foot of gigantic limestone cliffs that rose precipitously out of

the river, where men in white robes clinging t ledges were prying off great
the river, where men in white robes clinging t ledges were prying off great

blocks of rock that came rolling and crashi to the water’s edge to be loaded
blocks of rock that came rolling and crashi to the water's edge to be loaded

on barges. The sunlight on this scene made a blinding glare. Ang the people -
on barges. The sunlight on this scene made a blinding glare. Ang the people —

the picturesque people - no stretch so barren but that you can always see
the picturesque people - no X stretch so barren but that you can alWays see

those stately shrouded figures, working in the fields, at the Shadufs,
those stately shrouded figures, working in the fields, at the Shadufs,

fishing, sitting motionless brooding by the river, praying with their faces
fishing, sitting motion- less brooding by the river, praying with their faces

to the East, women filling their water jars and striding up the bank with the
to the East, women filling their water jars and striding up the bank with the

full jars on their heads, disdaining to touch them even with one hand, people
full jars on their heads, disdaining to touch them even with one hand, people

going and coming along the road - on foot, on donkeys, on camels (always
goin and coming along the road — on foot 0n donke*s on camels alwav‘

camels and donkeys everywhere), flocks feeding by the shore shepherded by one
camels and donkeys everywhere), flocks feeding by the’shore shephérded-h by one

or two cloaked and hooded figures. And on the river itself great barges loaded
Or two cloaked and hooded figures. And on the river itself greai barges loaded

with cotton, with grain, with water jars packed so that they look like cream
With cotton, with grain, with water jars packed so that they look like cream

people, but each and every craft carrying the lateen sail, so beautifu in its
people, but each and every craft carrying the lateen sail, so benutif in its

sweep even when its canvas is a crazy mess of tatters. We are almost
sweep even when its canvas is a crazy mass of tatters. u We are almost

criminally comfortable, and systematically over-fed - or would be if we ate
criminally comfortable, and systematically over-fed _ would be if we ate

all that was set before us. The Beduin draws only 14 inches of water, and
all that was set before us. The Beduin draws onIOr 14 inches of water, and

being towed, slides forward with such a total absence of motion that if it
being tOWed, slides forward with such a totqi absence of motion that if it

were not for the scenery slipping by we w not know we were moving at all.
were not for the scenery slipping by w; w not know we were moving at all.

There are 22 people on board just to take care of us four. We tie up every
There are 22 people on board just to take care of us four. We tie up every

night anywhere we happen to be at sunset. The tying-up process is as follows.
night anywhere we happen to be at sunset. The tying-up process is as f0110WS.

We draw up to the bank. One of the crew goes ashore with the anchor on his
We draw up to the bank. One of the crew goes ashore with the anchor on his

shoulder and worries it into the sane . Two of the crew carry huge wooden pins
shoulder and worries it into the sane. Two of the crew carry huge wooden pins

as b as hitching posts, ashore and two more of the crew armed with mallets
as b as hitching posts, ashore and two more of the crew armed with mﬂllets

made of sections of tree trunk hammer the pins into the sand and we ar tied to
made of sections of tree trunk hammer the pins into the sand and we hr tied to

those. Jones is always armed in case we are lying near a nati village that
those. Jones is always armed in case we are lying near a nati village that

might be inclined to depredations. We hope to reach Asyut tonight where there
might be inclined to depredations. We hope to reach Asyut tonight where there

ought to be much mail awaiting us, and where this will be posted. We do not
ought to be much mail aWait ing Us, and where this will be posted. We do not

expect to reach Luxo till the 21st at the earliest. Goodbye for now my
expect to reach Luxo till the let at the earliest. Goodbye for now my

Darling. It’s a month today since we sailed and this is my 4th letter to you
Darling. It‘s a month today since we sailed and this is my nth letter to you

besides pst cards. I shall be very anxious to hear how you are after your lit
besides pst cards. I shall be very anxious to hear how you are after your lit

operation, so don’t fail to carry out the instructions I sent you in m last
operation, so don't fail to carry out the instructions I sent you in m last

about having someone write to me at once. God bless my boy With all my love
about having someone write me at once. God bless my boy With all my love

Your Mim Dahabya Beduin On the Nile - tied up near Nag Hamadi, Friday 20
Your Mim Dahabya Beduin - On the Nile — tied up near Nag Hamadi, Friday 20

Dec. 1912 Darling Gopher - Doris and I went ashore at Asyut, under the escort
Dec. 1912 Darling Gopher - Doris and I went ashore at Asyut, under the escori

of Hareem to take a drive through the city. The beduin could not get close to
of Hareem to take a drive through the city. The Beduin could not get close to

the shore so we were landed in the felucca with six Nubians rowing it with a
the shore so we were landed in the felucca with six Nubians rowing it with a

man-of-war’s-men precision. We landed at the foot of steep, high bank done in
man~of—war's—men precision. We landed at the foot 01 steep, high bank done in

rough masonry, and before I had time to wonde how on earth I was to climb it I
rough masonry, and before I had time to Wonde how on earth I was to climb it-I 

found myself at the top. A trusty mariner at each elbow had wafted me thither.
found myself at the top. ,A trusty mariner at each elbow had wafted me thither.

There’s never the sligh fuss, - a nod, a single word from the person in
There's never the sligh1 fuss, - a nod, a single word from the person in

command and the thing done as if by magic. It was the same when we returned
command and the thing done as if by magic. It was the same when we returned

from our Asyut spree. The Beduin and the felucca had moved up the steam to a
from our Asyut spree. The Beduin and the felucca had moved up the stream to a

spot even the felucca couldn’t make a landing. A word form Hareem D. and I
spot‘ even the felucca couldn't make a landing. A word from Kareem and D.5 I

were picked up deftly, carried through the water and set down gently into the
were picked up deftly, carried through the water and set down gent” into the

boat. It was market day in Asyut and the entire population was apparently in
boat. It Was market day in Asyut and the entire popu3 tion was apparently in

the streets. We drove through the bazaar and market where men, women,
the streets. We drove through the bazaar and‘ market where men, women,

children, bulls, camels, donkeys were in one grand mass. It is a large,
children, bulls, camels, donkeys were in one grand mass. It is a large,

important, rich town, with many elaborate houses belonging to natives, and
important, rich tOWn, with many elaboratﬁ houses belonging to natives, and

during our entire drive we saw not single white person. In spite of the
during our entire drive we saw; not? single white person. a In spite of the

delights in store for us I hate to have this heavenly voyage end. To all the
delights in store for us I hate.to have this heavenll voyage end. To all the

enchantments of the shores have lately been added the most wonderful flocks
enchantments of the shores have lately been i added the most wonderful flocks

of birds. The Sister-Kittie announced yesterday when we joined her on deck
of birds. The Sister-Kittie announc‘ yesterday when we joined her on deck

that a flight of at least a thousand cranes had passed overhead, and not all
that a flight-of at least 8 thousand cranes had passed overhead, and not all

her come down one crane. I myself counted sixty-two pelicans sitting on a
her come down one crane. -I myself counted sixty—tw0 pelicans sitting on a

sandbar. And today we sailed by close to Kasz-es-Sayad ("the Hunter’s
sandbar. And today we sailed by close to Kasz-es—Sayad ("the Hunter's

Castle"), and what easily might be a castle is nothing more nor less that a
Castle"), and what easily might be a castle is nothing more nor less that a

colossal pigeon-house. Hundreds of thousands of pigeons were perching on the
colossal pigeon-house. Hundreds of thousands of pigeons were perching on the

battlements or flying about them, and little flocks were hastening home to
battlements or flying about them, and little flocks here hastening home to

them from all directions. They are bred in this land as much for their
them from all directions. They are bred in this land as much for their

droppings, which make a much-prized fertilizer, as for food. (That’s a horrid
droppings, which make a much—prized fertilizer, as for food. (That's a horrid

sounding sentence but you will understand what I mean). On the West bank of
sounding sentence but you Will understand What I mean). On the West bank of

the river, opposite the Hunter’s Castle, is the little town of Hou where for
the river, opposite the Hunter's Castle, is the little town of Hou where for

53 years Shieck Selim sat stark naked on the bank of the Nile. He died a few
53 years Shieck Selim sat stark naked on the bank of the Nile. He died a few

years ago, and they built a tomb on his sitting place to which the natives
years ago, and they built a tomb on his sitting place to which the natives

make pilgrimages. Clothes seem rather lightly esteemed in Egypt. If the day is
make pilgrimages. Clothes seem rather lightly esteemed in Egypt. If the day is

warm the Shaduf workers wear practically the same garb as the Apache Indian,
Warm the Shaduf workers wear practically the same garb as the Apache Indian,

and their beautiful bodies look like bronze. We were passing quite close to
and their beautiful bodies look like bronze. We were passing quite close to

the shore when a gentleman bounded down the banks, yanked off his one and only
the shore when a gentleman bounded down the banks, yanked off his one and only

garment and proceeded to do is laundry work in the Nile. Sunday - 22nd
garment and proceeded to do is laundry work in the Nile. Sunday — 22nd

December. The Beduin, Luxor. At noon yesterday - and a day soaked in sunshine
December. The Beduin, Luxor. At noon yesterday - and a day soaked in sunshine

- we came in the sight of Luxor, and a short time thereafter had reached its
— we came in sight of Luxor, and a short time thereafter had reached its

outskirts, and from the window of a dahabya tied to the east bank the
outskirts, and from the Window of a dahabya tied to the east bank the

pleasant, tousled head of Nicole, an English artist, bowed and called
pleasant, tousled head of Nicole, an English artist, bowed and called

greetings to Cousin Theodore. Past some charming looking hotels we slipped,
greetings to Cousin Theodore. Past some charming looking hotels we slipped,

catching glimpses in between of the most beautiful columns of the Temple of
catching glimpses in between of the most beautiful columns of the Temple of

Luxor, past the Winter Palace Hotel, and then diagonally across the rive to
Luxor, past the Winter Palace Hotel, and then diagonally across the rive to

our mooring place on the west shore. We have it all to ourselves at present,
our mooring place on the west shore. We have it all to ourselves at present,

the other boats preferring to be in the thick of everythin on the east bank.
the other boats preferring to be in the thick of everythin on the east bank.

But we have a beautiful sandy beach on which the crew have pitched their tent,
But we have a beautiful sandy beach on which the crew have pitched their tent,

and where we instantly established the poultry yard. The three coops were
and where we instantly established the poultry yard. The three coops were

taken from the dahabya put on the sand and opened. Sir Francis Drake and his
taken from the dahabya put on the sand and openede Sir Francis Drake and his

three ladies waddled madly for the bank, slid down it on their tails and
three ladies Waddled madly for the bank, slid down it on their tails and

launched themselves joyously upon the water. The White Cock stepped daintily
launched themselves joyously upon the Water. The White Cock stepped daintily

forth, lonely but still gallant. All his wives were eaten on the way up. But
forth, lonely but still gallant. Alllis wives were eaten on the way up. But

seldom are widowers so soon consoled - by 9 a.m. today he had three more.
seldom are widowers so soon con— soled - by 9 a.m. today he had three more.

The turkey cock and his consort emerged from their coop so stiff they could
The turkey cock and his consort emerged from their coop so stiff they could

hardly stand up. But they were soon limbered, and the gobbler strutted and
hanﬂy stand up. But they were soon limbered, and-the gobbler strutted and

rustled and gobbled as though he owned the earth. But Oh my dear! if you could
rustled and gobbled as though he owned the earth. But Oh my dear! if you could

see what lies beyond our beach! A great plain with stretches of sand and
see what lies beyond our beach! A great plain with stretches of sand and

stretches of lovely green, and clumps of trees, and then the fierce and
stretches of lovely green, and clumps of trees, and then the fierce and

glaring and beautiful Lybian mountains making a mighty wall beyond. I cannot
glaring and beautiful Lybinn mountains making a mighty wall beyond. I cannot

give you any idea of how wonderful it is. I could have spent the whole
give you any idea of how Wonder- ful it is. I could have spent the whole

afternoon looking, but I suddenly went wild with neuralgia in my face and
afternoon looking, but I sudden- ly went Wild with neuralgia in my face and

took to my bed and suffered torments for hours, and then - as suddenly - the
took to my bed and suffered torments for hours, and then — as suddenly - the

pain left and I slept all night, and got up this morning ready for anything. I
pain left and I slept all night, and got up this morning ready for anything. I

wanted to go to church this a.m. but Cousin Emma objected as my face was still
wanted to go to church this a.m. but Cousin Emma objected as my face was still

swollen and she said the church was always cold. This afternoon when Cousin
swollen and she said the church was always cold. This afternoon when Cousin

Theodore had had his nap, he, Doris, I and Jones, all in our riding clothes,
Theodore had had his nap, he, Doris, I and Jones, all in our riding clothes,

were rowed across the river in the felucca. Our donkeys were awaiting us in
were rowed across the river in the felucca- Our donkeys were awaiting us in

front of the Winter Palace, the donkey boys (old retainers) kissed our hands
front of the Winter Palace, the donkey boys (old retainers) kissed our hands

and off we started for Karknak. We could only take a most cursory look at thos
and off we started for Karnak. We could only take a most cursory look at thos

It was lovely the way lines of dragomans and donkey boys along the road 
it Was lovely the way lines of dragomans ﬁnd donkey boys along the reng me‘

would rise to their feet beaming and shouting welcomes to Cousin T. We
would rise to their feet beaming and shouting Welcomes to Cousin T. % r0 9 s We

got quite a lot of letters yesterday, but my dearest one was from you,-the
got quite a lot of letters yesterday, but my dearest one th from i :0 you,-the

one of Dec. 1, telling about the Harvard game, and your Thanksgiving, and
one of Dec. 1, telling about the Harvard game, and your Thank; in giving, and

the chillblains - poor darling - they do hurt so dreadfully. I suppose you
the chillblains - poor darling — they do hurt so dreadfully? to I suppose you

are in Cleveland tonight, or will be shortly. I love to of you with those
are i Cleveland tonight, or will be shortly. I love to? Wt of you with those

dear people since I may not have you myself. And I fancy that Arthur’s
dear people since I may not have you myself, And I :é Er fancy that Arthur's

death will prevent the excess of gaiety you were dreading. They open the big
death will prevent the excess of gaiety you Were g A1 e2 T! dreading.

dam at Assouan tomorrow, and the Khedive passed throu Luxor today on his way
w, and the Khedive passed thrOu c on of him

there, but the only indication of him that we sa was the many flags with which
that we sa I suppose Lord Kitch at Assouan tomorro but the only indicati decorated. than

Luxor is decorated. I suppose Lord Kitch went through too. I’d rather see Lord
any man alive. They open the big dam Luxor today on his Way there,

K. than any man alive. Goodnight dear love - God bless my boy and grant
was the many flags with Which.Luxor is Went through too. I'd rather see Lord K. and grant

him a Happy, Happy New Year. Your loving Mim Christmas Night
him a Happy, Happy Goodnight dear love New Year. Your loving him — God bless my boy Christmas Night

Luxor, 1912 Darling Gopher - The nicest things that happened to me today were
Luxor, 1912 Darling Gopher — The nicest things that happened to me today were

receipt of your letter of Dec. 7, and the fact that Emily Morgan spent a
receipt of your letter of Dec. 7, and the fact that Emily Morgan spent a

little part of the day with us. Those two things kept me from wholly
little part of the day with.us. Those two things kept me from wholly

succumbing to homesickness. I felt its touch on my shoulder, so to spe all day
'succumbing to homesickness. I felt its touch.on my shoulder, so to she all day

long. The Serapis and Mr. Tuck and his party, of which Emily and Miss Nelson
long. The Serapis and Mr. Tuck and his party, of Which Emily a Miss Kelson

are two-ninths, came down from Aswan yesterday. They waved from the deck as
are tWO—ninths, came down from Aswan yesterday. They waved from the deck as

they steamed by us, and soon after luncheon we went ov to the Serapis to call.
they steamed by us, and soon after luncheon We went ox to the Serapis to call.

Emily is certainly one of the sweetest things all the world. I was as glad to
Emily is certainly one of the sweetest things all the World. 1 Was as glad to

see her as if she were my very own. I hung up my stocking as I’ve never missed
see her as if she were my very own. as I've never missed

doing, but the Sister-Kittie refused to indulge in what she seemed to consider
doing, but the Sister-Kittie refused to indulge in what she seemed to consider

an empty form without a chimney piece to hang them by. Cousin Theodore gave us
an empty form Withoui a chimney piece to hang them by. Cousin Theodore gave us

his presents in Cairo - a pearl and diamond ring to Doris, and a stunning gold
his presents in Cairo — a pearl and diamond ring to Doris, and a stunning gold

mesh purse to me. Doris gave me a beautiful red linen cover with 
mesh purse to me. Doris gave me a beautiful red linen cover with dalwood box,-

embroidery for my table; Cousin Emma gave me an inlaid sandalwood box, Dick
embroidery ﬁr my table: Cousin Emma gave me an inlaid san Dick

Baker gave me another one. (Doris was his agent). The Mitchell ladies, Mrs
Baker gave me an (Doris Was his agent). The Mitchell ladies, Mrs

Hoppin and Aunt Mabel had all sent me packages to bring ov with me.
Hoppin an .ad all sent me packages to bring 0V§ ‘s and me ea ’ with me.

Jones gave Doris and me each a little silver seal with our initials in Arabic
Jones gave Dori ch a little silver seal With our initials in Arabic

engraved on it. We were much touched by this gift. And Mohammed Muhassef, the
engraved on it. We were much touched by this giftﬁ And Mohammed Muhassef, the

best known and most reliable antiquity deal here, sent D. & me each a scarab.
best known and most reliable antiquity dealﬁ here, sent D. & me each a scarab.

Cousin T. has had many dealins with so every Christmas he sends a present to
Cousin T. has had many dealins With: so every Christmas he sends a present to

each member of Cousin T’s par After the breakfast things were cleared from the
each member of Cousin T's Ptﬂ After the breakfast things were cleared from the

table, the ceremony of giving the crew their presents took place. Cousin T. &
table, the ceremony d giving the crew their presen Cousin T. &

Cousin E. sat the table, D. & I on the divan, and Jones was master of
Cousin E. sat? the table, D. & l on the divan, and Jones was master of

ceremonies. T crew and inside servants came in one by one, kissed our hands,
ceremonies. n ' one, kissed our hands, said crew and_inside serVants came in one

said "Kulle sana w’inta taiyih" (A Happy New Year to you), and each receiv a
by "Kulle sana w'inta taiyih" (A Happy NeW'Year to you), and each receiV are

white shawl, a box of cigarettes, a bag with candy and nuts, 
tes ' b: Mt d' d t : 5 me $hen’they‘gll Eadahad thei?upiése3%s ghe Hip, Hip, Hooray! T‘ank you, ’ the

 and some money, and departed beaming. When they all had had their presents
deck and shouted "Hip, and we retired to our several apartments and d5 in

the gathered on the deck and shouted "Hip, Hip, Hip, Hooray! T’ank you, t’ank
dioxygen. I hung up my stocking ts took place. a White 5 L‘l z

you, t’ank you", and we retired to our several apartments and washed our
b ' f ' money, anquepartegxbgamih . gathered on t'ank you, t'ank you", washed our

hen the felucca took Doris and me across the river, and Harry Burton et us at
hen the felucca took Doris and me across the river, and Harry Burton et us at

the steps (he is stopping at the Winter Palace, there being no oom for him on
the steps (he is sopping at the Winter Palace, there being no 00m for him on

the Beduin) and conducted us to the English Church which s away at the rear of
the Beduin) and conducted us to the English Church which 5 away at the rear of

a garden filled with palms and acacias and other ovely things, and where an
a garden filled with palms and acacias and other Ovely things, and where an

Arab was ringing the bell outside, as they did n "Bunty". And Emily joined us
Arab was ringing the bell outside, us they did n "Bunty". And Emily joined us

inside. It was very comforting to me o have her go to church with us this
inside. It Was very comforting to me -0 have her to go to church with us this

far land on this Day of Days. hen we came back to the Beduin we brought Harry
far land on this Day of Days. (hen we came back to the Beduin we brought Harry

and Mr. Crane (a young nglish artist, son of the better known Walter Crane) to
and Mr. Crane (n young son of the better knOWn Walter Crane) to

luncheon. fter luncheon they wanted us to go to the Gymkana in the Winter
luncheon. .fter luncheon they wanted us to go to the Gymkana in the Winter

Palace ardens, but the Tucks were coming at four for tea so we couldn’t. The
Palace :ardens, but the Tucks were coming at four for tea so we couldn't. The

ucks came and Emily and Miss Nelson and Major Curley, and they were razy about
‘ucks came and Emily and Miss Nelson and Major Curley, and they were :razy about

the boat, and we had a lovely time. They go on their way to Cairo tomorrow at
the boat, and we had a lovely time. They go on their way to iairo tomorrow at

one. We had such a perfectly enormous inner tonight with only the four of us
one. We had such a perfectly enormous inner tonight with only the four of us

to eat it that by the time the turkey arrived we could only look at it
to eat it that by the time the :urkey arrived we could only look at it

regretfully, and have it carried off unscathed, for we had to eat plum
regretfully, and have it carried .ff unscathed, for we had to eat plum

pudding. Jones having heard me remark that I was going to break over my total
pudding. Jones having heard me ‘emark that I was going to break over my total

abstinence on Christmas in order to drink a toast to you, had supplied
abstinence on Christmas in >rder to drink a toast to you, had supplied

champagne from the wine cellar, wherever that may be. The Cousins never touch
champagne from the Wine :ellar, wherever that may be.c The Cousins never touch

champagne, so Doris and I drank alone to "our son and brother", and then I
champagne, so Joris and I drank alone to "our son and brother", and then I

drank a comprehensive toast to "all the people I love". We had a splendid
drank a :omprehensive toast to "all the people I love". nglish artist, ’e had a splendid

mail awaiting us when we got back from church this morning. It was so good to
mail awaiting us when we got back from church this norning. It Was so good to

have it come on Christmas Day. I do hope you got my first letter very soon
have it come on Christmas Day. I do hope rou got my first letter very soon

after you sent yours. I think I explained in it that people told us on no
after you sent yours. I think I ex— alained in it that people told us on no

account to post letters at Gib. because it sometimes took months for them to
account to post letters at Gib. )ecause it sometimes took months for them to

reach their destinations from there. So I only mailed you a postcard from
reach their destinations from there. So I only mailed you a postcard from

there & sent my first letter from Naples the minute we landed on the 27th.
there & sent my first letter ?rom Naples the minute we landed on the 27th.

Dec. 26th. Doris and I mounted on our gallant donkeys, (mine is named Sugar)
Dec. 26th. Doris and I mounted on our gallant donkeys, (mine is named Sugar)

and followed by our donkey boys (mine is named Mahmoud) rode off this morning
and followed by our donkey boys (mine is named Mahmoud) rode off this morning

towards the Libyan mountains, the object of our visit being the Colossi - see
towards the Libyan mountains, the object of our visit being the Colossi — see

picture enclosed, which stand not far from their foot. The figures are 52feet
picture enclosed, Which stand not far from their foot. Fhe figures are SZfeet

in height; the slab pedestals on which their thrones and feet rest are 13ft in
in height; the slab pedestals on which their thrones and feet rest are 13ft in

height, making the entire height 65 ft. Even in this land of mighty marvels
height, making the entire height 65 ft. Even in this land of mighty marvels

they seem all that there is of the extraordinary. Well, dearest, dozens of
they seem all that there is of the extraordinary. Well, dearest, dozens of

other letters must be written, so fare thee well for now. Endless love and
other letters must be written, soiare thee well for DOW- Endless love and

many blessings on your belove head. Your very own Mim Dahabya Beduin Luxor - 1
many blessings on your belove head. Your very own Mim Dahabya Beduin Luxor - 1

January 1913 Happy New Year, Best Beloved. I got up early so as to make my
January 1913 Happy New Year, Best Beloved. I got up early so as to make my

greeting to you the first one I either uttered or wrote. And I wrote it just
greeting to you the first one I either uttered or wrote. And I wrote it just

in time, for in another two minutes Amelie came in with my orange juice,-
in time, for in another two minutes Amelie came in with my orange juice,-

which is my waking ceremony every morning. The principal thing that has
which is my waking ceremony every morning. The principal thing that has

occurred since my last week’s letter to you was our visit to the Valley. We
Occurred since my last week's letter to y0u was our visit to the Valley. We

all went out last Friday, Doris, Cousin T. and Jones riding, and Cousin E and
all went out last Friday, Doris, Cousin T. and Jones riding, and Cousin E and

I driving. It’s seven miles. I meant to ride also, but I found Cousin Emma
I driving. It's seven miles. I meant to ride also, but I found Cousin Emma

alone so I went with her. Our vehicle was a sort of surrey thing draw by two
‘alone so I went with her. Our vehicle was a sort of surrey thing drnﬁ , by two

mules and driven by a pirate in baggy white "trou." When we finally
mules and driven by a pirate in baggy white "trou." When we ': he 1 finally

entered the Valley my breath was taken away. It was like driving on a very
entered the Valley my breath was taken away, It 'as like driv fU1 ing on a very

good, glaring white road through the wreck of the world. Absolutely the
good, glaring white road through the wreck of the w0r1d§ Eh? Absolutely the

desert, not a suggestion of a growing thing anywhere. Towering cliffs all
desert, not a suggestion of a growing thing anywhere. “e Towering cliffs all

about us, wild masses of rock hurled everywhere, lless stretches of broken
about us, wild masses of rock hurled everywhere, less stretches of broken

fragments of flint and limestone and fossiliz shells, the blazing sun, the
fragments of flint and limestone and fossili- G00 shells, the blazing sun, the

splendid cloudless sky. The house is in what is called the West Valley, which,
splendid cloudless Sky. The house is in What is caﬂed the West Valley, which,

though it contains two or three tombs, is not the valley of the Tombs, being
though it contains tWO or three, tombs, is not the valley of the Tombs, being

divided from that by a ridge. The house is long, low (one storied)
divided from that by a ridge. The house is long, low (one storied)

flat-roofed, made of roug stone, plastered with mud, and looking like
flat—roofed, made of FOUg stone, plastered with mud, and looking like

thousands of Mexican houses. It stands in a narrow part of the valley with
thousands of Mexican hOUse iNuHMs, It stands in a narrow part of the valley with

cliffs directly behind it and a stone’s throw across the road in front of it
cliffs directly behind i Dal and a stone's throw aCross the road in front of it

another ridge dividing it from a third valley. The bedrooms are like cells
another ridge divid yox ing it from a third valley. The bedrooms are like cells

with little s of windows in the foot-and-a-half thick walls. The sitting
With little Q As of windows in the foot—and—a—half thick walls. The sitting

room is ba and mannish and the dining room ditto, - but all very neat. Harry
room is m, p0 and mannish and the dining room ditto, - but all very neat. Harry

Bur is a delightfully orderly person. You know he is managing your uncle’ 
Em Na is a delightfully orderly person. You know he is managing your uncleg 51

excavations and so lives out there in the house. All the water used t is
excavations and so lives out there in the house. All the water used g St is

brought miles in jars on donkeyback - as it was in Ecuador. Threr an
brought miles in jars on donkeyback - as it was in Ecuador. Threrg Y0 an

excellent cook, and a houseboy and two guards. A guard armed with rifle 
eXCellent cook, and a houseboy and two guards. A guard armed with? my ___rifle

stands at the front corner of the house all night. Saturday
stands at the front corner of the house all night. ‘ he I —" i I a Saturday

morning we all proceeded to the Valley of the Tombs, Cousin T mounted on
morning we all proceeded to the Valley of the Tombs, Cousinf Tl mounted on

Julius Caesar (a perfect devil of a black donkey who loves his own voice so
Julius Caesar (a perfect devil of a black donkey who loves; da his own voice so

he brays all the time), Cousin Emma in a chair carrie by two men and
he brays all the time), Cousin Emma in a chair carrié er a...” a H by tWO men and

D. & I on foot. It was a sensation of a lifetime to visit that place for the
D. & I on foot. It was a sensation of a lifetime to visit that place for the

first time. A number of tombs are open to th public, so George Bourne will
first time. A number of tombs are open to t“ 5 public, so George Bourne Will

have no difficulty in gratifying his des But Cousin T. is doing the only
have no difficulty in gratifying his de t But Cousin T. is doing the only

excavating now going on in the valley, it was amusing to pass by groups of
excavating now going on in the valley,» it was amusing to pass by groups of

gazing, gaping tourists and disapp into an opening labelled "No Admittance"
gazing, gaping tourists and disapp into an opening labelled "No Admittance"

from which were issuing clouds of dust and a procession of children carrying
from which were issuing cloud of dust and a procession of children carrying

dirt and rocks in baskets which they emptied on a dump. Most of the manual
dirt and rocks in basket Which they emptied on a dump. Most of the manual

labor in excavations in this region is done by children and I hate it. They
labor in excavations in this region is done by children and I hate it. They

are urged on b overseers with whips. But our overseer was deprived of his whip
are urged on overseers with whips. But our overseer was deprived of his whip

last year when Harry saw him cut a piece out of a boy’s leg with the lash.
last year when Harry saw him cut a piece out of a boy's leg with the lash.

Time fails to tell you of the marvels of the tombs we saw.That afternoon 
”a...” _..._....a‘.. 'Time fails to tell you of the marvels of the tombs we.saW.That after— q noon

I took a walk alone and climbed a ridge and went down into another valley and
I took a walk alone and climbed a ridge and went down into anotb valley and

up on the ridge beyond. And the sun went down, and without sunshine it is
up on the ridge beyond. And the sun went down, and withom n sunshine it is

the most terrible place I ever saw. The silence was drful, and I was
the most terrible place I ever saw. The silence was b 5 ful, and I was

suddenly siezed with a horror of the desert and fled ba to the house where I
suddenly siezed with a horror of the desert and fled b -} to the house Where I

was much rebuked for wandering off by myself. Sunday afternoon Cousin T. on
was much rebuked for wandering off by myself. ( Sunday afternoon Cousin T. on

Julius and D. & I on our tooties explore the West Valley away up beyond the
Julius and D. & I on our tooties explor < the West Valley away up beyond the

house, and why all the kings didn’t make their tombs there I cannot
house, and why all the kings didn" ‘ make their tombs there I cannot

understand. It is the most regal, stunning and awe inspiring place I think I
understand. It is the most regal, stunning and awe inspiring place I think I

ever saw. Cousin Emma and I came home to the Dahabya Monday morning and glad
ever saw. Cousin Emma and I came home to the Dahabya Monday morning and glad

enough we were to get here. But Cousin Theodore and Doris tarried til
enough we were to get here. But Cousin Theodore and Doris-tarried ti 

yesterday. He perfectly (excuse me!) adores it. But it would get on nerves
yesterday. He perfectly (excuse me!) adores it. But it would get on nerves

We had a wonderful mail today, but no letter from you. We had a wonderful 
We had a wonderful mail today, but no letter from you. We had a wonder— ful

ride this afternoon, Cousin T., D. & I. over to Medinet Habu, near the foot of
ride this afternoon, Cousin T., D. & I. over to Medinet Habu, near the foot of

the mountains, where there are the most beautiful ruins we’ve seen yet. 
the mountains, where there are the most beautiful ruins we've seen yet. V

Goodnight, Darling, and God bless my boy. Your Loving Mim West Bank at Luxor -
Goodnight, Darling, and God bless my boy. Your Loving Mim West Bank at Luxor —

10 January 1913 Darling Gopher - It’s more than two weeks since I’ve heard
10 January 1913 Darling Gopher - It's more than two weeks since I've heard

from you and I’m beginning to be afraid that a letter must have been lost. As
from you and I'm beginning to be afraid that a letter must have been lost. As

for me I’ve written you with the utmost regularity, beginning with a postal
for me I've written you with the utmost regularity, beginning with a postal

from Gib, followed by a letter mailed the minute I arrived in Naples on the
from Gib, followed by a letter mailed the minute I arrived in Naples on the

27th, pursued by another mailed at Alexandria Dec. 2, since which I’ve written
27th, pursued by another mailed at Alexandria Dec. 2, since which I’ve written

once a week. A letter just arrived from Jack Stewart and written on Christmas
once a Week. A letter just arrived from Jack Stewart and written on Christmas

day says "I suppose Roger has written you of his visit to Savannah with Bill
day says "I suppose Roger has Written you of his visit to Savannah with Bill

Hunter". Of course I am wholly mystified. Unless a letter comes from you soon,
Hunter". Of course I am wholly mystified. Unless a letter comes from you soon,

my feeling of remoteness will begin to be intolerable. Things go on
my feeling of remote- ness will begin to be intolerable. Things go on

happening here with the most delightful frequency and the days flit by on the
happening here with the most delightful frequency and the days flit by on the

wings of the wind. I bask in constant sunlight, and wear summer clothes, and
wings of the wind. I bask in constant sunlight, and wear summer clothes, and

am beginning to look so young that Cousin Theodore persistently refers to me,
am beginning to look so young that Cousin Theodore persistently refers to me,

when speaking to Doris, as "Your sister". Our most recent excitement is a note
when speaking to Doris, as "Your sister". Our most recent excitement is a note

arrived from Harry Burton this morning before breakfast saying that he had
arrived from Harry Burton this morning before breakfast saying that he had

found (in a new sepulchral chamber he opened a few days ago) a red granite
found (in a new sepulchral chamber he opened a few days ago) a red granite

sarcophagus with a recumbent figure carved on the lid. The note further said
sarcophagus with a recumbent figure carved on the lid. The note further said

it would take about two days to clear away the debris in which it is embedded.
it Would take about two days to clear away the debris in Which it is em~

 Cousin Theodore, Doris and Jones are going to ride over to the valley
bedded= Cousin Theodore, Doris and Jones are going to ride over to the valley

tomorrow afternoon and spend the night, and await developments. I want to go
tomorrow afternoon and spend the night, and await developments. I want to go

also, but it isn’t fair to leave Cousin Emma alone so I’m going to stay with
also, but it isn't fair to leave Cousin Emma alone so I'm going to stay with

her. I think I shall ride part way with them for the sake of the ride, and
her. I think I shall ride part way with them for the sake of the ride, and

then come back alone with Mahmoud, my donkey boy - and possibly one of the
then come back alone with Mahmoud, my donkey boy — and possibly one of the

crew. When Cousin T., D. & I go out we are quite a cavalcade - we three
crew. When Cousin T., D. & I go out we arl quite a cavalcade - we-three 

mounted, and three donkey boys and two sailors running beside us. I’ve come to
mounted, and three donkey boys and two sailors running beside us. I've come to

the reluctant conclusion that my donkey, Sugar, has too small a tummy to
the reluctant conclusion that my donkey, Sugar, has too small a tummy to

clinch a sidesaddle to. My saddle is continually turning and I have to
cinch a sidesaddle to. My saddle is continually turning and I have to

dismount and hold up the procession and have it readjusted. Jones thought it
dismount and hold up the procession and have it readjusted. Jones thought it

might be the fault of the saddle, and, in his determination to have me suited,
might be the fault of the saddle, and, in his determination to have me suited,

the other day he, assisted by two donkey boys and six of the crew, saddled and
the other ‘day he, assited by two donkey boys and six of the crew, saddled and

unsaddled that one small donkey with various sidesaddles while all Luxor
unsaddled that one small donkey with various sidesaddles While all Luxor

looked on. But no sidesaddle stays put for more than fifteen minutes on Sugar,
looked on. But no sidesaddle stays put for more than fifteen minutes on Sugar,

so I think I’ll have to give him up. I hate to,- he’s so pretty and cunning
so I think I'll have to give him up. I hate to,- he's so pretty and cunning

and makes me think of Kim. Sunday afternoon we took a rather unusual ride, not
and makes me think of Kim. Sunday afternoon we took a rather unusual ride, not

visiting any ruins (which is what we almost always do) but riding through
visiting any ruins (which is what we almost always do) but riding through

miles of cultivated fields where steam ployghs were at work and the water
miles of culti— vated fields where steam ployghs were at work and the water

flowing through cemented irrigating ditches,- all more modern and progressive
flowing through cemented irrigating ditches,— all more modern and progressive

than anything we have seen, and quite dull and uninteresting compared with the
than anything we have seen, and quite dull and uninteresting compared with the

Tuesday night Doris and I made our first plunge into Luxor society. There are
 and I made our first plunge into LUXOI‘ society. 

some perfectly charming Americans, Mr. and Mrs. Garret Pier, staying at the
 charming Americans, Mr. and Mrs. Garret Pier staying at the

Winter Palace, and they invited D. & me to dine and stay for the regular
Winter Palace, and they invited D. & me to dine nnd ’ stay for the regular

Tuesday evening dance. It was such a fascinating way to go to dinner, - to
Tuesday evening dance. It was such a fascinating Way to go to dinner, — to

step into an immaculate felucca and go skim down the starlit river with six
step into an immaculate felucca and go Skim; down the starlit river with six

white durbans bowing rhythmically bef us as the men bent to their oars; then
white durbans bowing rhythmically beﬂ us as the men bent to their oars; then

to be escorted by two of our c bearing lanterns, up to the entrance of the
to be escorted by two of our c, baaring lanterns, up to the entrance of the

hotel, and to find them standing like statues awaiting us when we left the
hotel, and to find them_ standing like statues aWaiting us when we left the

hotel at eleven. Doris met some awfully amusing young Englishmen, two or three
hotel at eleven. Doris met some awfully amusing young Englishmen, two or three

of whom could actually dance well, and I enjoyed myself immensely just talkin
of whOm could actually dance well, and I enjoyed myself immensely just talkin

to people. We’ve just had a Baron and Baroness Von Bissing
to people. Tuesday night Doris There are some perfectly We've just had a Baron and Baroness Von Bissing

lunching with us. He is a sort of German translation of Leonard Bacon. The
lunching with u5. He is a sort of German translation of Leonard Bacon. The

resemblance is too amusing. We see by the Paris Herald that George Bourne has
resemblance is too amusing. We see by the Paris Herald that George Bourne has

been married. I wonder if he will come out here on his wedding journey. You
been married. I Wonder if he will come out here on his wedding journey, 

will now be able to tell me something of Mrs. Moses. I’ve writte twice without
 me something of Mrs. Moses. I've writte tWice without

getting an answer to either missive. I cannot understand it. Please be sure to
getting an answer to either missive. I cannot undErst> it. Please be sure to

send me her new address, though I should think Savannah, Georgia would reach
send me her new address, though I should thin} Savannah, Georgia would reach

her. And have you been to see Kim? Please go! I can’t bear to have him forget
her. And have you been to see Kim? Please go! I can't bear to have him forget

his family. Dr. Nolte is the name, and you can find the address in the
his family. Dr. Nolte i: the name, and you can find thejaddress in the

telephone book. Endless love from us both and please write to
telephone book. You will now be able to tell Endless love from us both and please write to

your adoring Mim. I hope you wrote to your grandmother at
your adoring Mim. randmother at Christmas time. If you have I hope you wrote to your g She

Christmas time. If you have done so, do it now for my sake. She wrote me
Wrote me she sent you a couple done so, do it now for my sake. 

she sent you a couple books. West Bank at Luxor 23 January, 1913 Darling
 books. West Bank at Luxor 23 January, 1913 

Gopher - Your letter of the 8th arrived today, - fift days is pretty quick
 Your letter of the 8th arrived today, - fift days is pretty quick

work, the quickest possible I fancy. I was awf glad to get it, and I am also
work, the quickest possible I fancy. I was an glad to get it, and I am also

glad to be able to tell you that it’s quite all right with Mr. Eells as well
glad to be able to tell you that its quite all right with Mr. Eells as well

as with Mrs., for I had a fi long letter from him on Sunday expressing much
as with Mrs., for I had a fir .long letter from him on Sunday expressing much

disappointment, but traces of annoyance at your failure to come to
disappointment, but r traces of annoyance at your failure to come to

Cleveland. He is so sensitive I was afraid he might think you went to Savannah
Cleveland. He is so sensitive I Was afraid he might think you Vent to Savannah

merely because you preferred to. Congratulations on having passed your exams
merely be cause you preferred to. Congratulations on having passed your exam:

also on having done the nice thing at Christmas by Nan, and others i your
also on having done the nice thing at Christmas by Nan, and others i your

grandmother. By the way, did you really - as man to man, mind like your
grandmother. By the Way, did you really — as man to man, mind‘ like your

waistcoat? Doris and I had an argument over it. She mai you would think it
waistcoat? Doris and I had an argument over it. She mam you Would think it

vulgarly loud, while I insisted that there was n in getting a fancy waistcoat
vulgarly loud, while I insisted that there was n( in getting a fancy Waistcoat

unless it was fancy, and I thought it w go very well with the Oxford grey
unless it was fancy, and I thought it\ go very well with the Oxford grey

clothes I made you get. Bud Talb had already, in a letter to me, broken the
clothes I made you get. Bud Tnlbl had already, in a letter to be, broken the

horrid news about Lefty Cloister has certainly got a black eye this winter,
horrid news about Lefty» Cloister has certainly got a black eye this Winter,

nicht wahr? Various exciting things have happened "all in the blue, unclouded
nicht Wehr? Darling Gopher - ened "all in the blue, unclouded

w since my last letter. On Sunday Doris and Cousin
W nth by the peerless Jones, bnsely deserted Cous Various exciting things have happ since my last letter. On Sunday Doris and Cousin

T., mounted on th donkeys and accompanied by the peerless Jones, basely
T., mounted o donkeys and accompanied 

Emma and me and trotted over to the Valley to spend the night’ while we had to
.Emma and me and trotted over to the Valley to spend the night' while Wen had to

sit tamely on deck like perfect ladies, and dispense tea and cakes to strange
sit tamely on deck like perfect ladies, and dispense tea and Cakes to strange

Americans from Buffalo whom we had never seen before. Sir Gaston Maspero was
Americans from Buffalo Whom we had never seen before. Sir Gaston Maspero was

to join them the next morning at the Tombs and pronounce judgement on the red
to join them the next morning at the Tombs and pronounce judgement on the red

granite sarcophagus. The next afternoon I had just got back from a long walk
granite sarcophagus. The next afternoon I had just got back from a long walk

(accompanied by a sailor with a heavy stick,) packed with fleas which I had
(accompanied by a sailor With a heavy stick,) packed with fleas which I had

annexed in a native village I suddenly found myself in; and was having tea on
annexed in a native village I suddenly found myself in; and was having tea on

deck in company with th Contessa Contardone and Mr. Tremaine when the
deck in company with th( Contessa Contardone and Mr. Tremaine When the

cavalcade returned from the Valley. It had quite the effect in a mild way of
Cavalcade returned from the Valley. It had quite the effect in a mild way of

explorers returning from the African desert as they came in single file across
explorers returning from the African desert as they came in single file across

the sands; fir the sumpter mule (so to speak) with the luggage, then Cousin
the sands; fir the sumpter mule (so to speak) with the luggage, then Cousin

T., Doris & Jones with the donkey boys running beside them, and Julius Caesar
T., Doris & Jones With the donkey boys running beside them, and Julius Caesar

braying his head off as they came. Doris was beaming. She had had the most
bray— ing his head off as they came. Doris was beaming. She had had the most

wonderful time with Maspero who had lunched with them in the House in the
wonderful time with Maspero Who had lunched with them in the House in the

Valley and who talked as she never had heard anyone talk before. He pronounced
Valley and who talked as she never had heard anyone talk before. He pronounced

the sarcophagus a treasure, wants it for the Museum in Cairo, but also wants
the sarcophagus a treasure, wants it for the Museum in Cairo, but also wants

Cousin Theodore to pay the insignificant sum of 250 poinds sterling for its
Cousin Theodore to pay the insignificant sum of 250 poinds sterling for its

transportation there! The Contessa invited Doris and me to go on a picnic the
transportation there! The Contessa invited Doris and me to go on a picnic the

next day at the great temple of Medinet Habu, to see the magic performances of
next day at the great temple of Medinet Habu, to see the magic performances of

a noted Arab snake-charmer she had persuaded to come down from Esneh for the
a noted Arab snake-charmer she had persuaded to come down from Esneh for the

purpose. We went, and it was an extraordinary experience. (Doris had a nasty
purpose. We went, and it was an extraordinary experience. V(Doris had a nasty

spill on the way out. Her donkey stepped into a pitfall, flung her, fell on
spill on the way out. Her donkey stepped into a pitfall, flung her, fell on

her and kicked her, but she insisted on going on, with her usual pluck, and in
her and kicked her, but she insisted on going on, With her usual pluck, and in

the end suffered no serious effects). I simply haven’t the time to give you an
the end suffered no serious effects). I simply haven't time to give you an

account of what happened at the ruins. It was both dramatic and astounding.
account of what happened at the ruins. It was both dramatic and astounding.

The Arab stalking in front of the picnic, who all straggled after him, recited
The Arab stalking in front of the picnic, who all straggled after him, recited

some sort of incantation in a loud clear voice, and lured snakes from out of
some sort of incantation in a loud clear voice, and lured snakes from out of

thornbushes on the desert and the coy cobra from chinks in the temple wall.
thornbushes on the desert and the coy cobra from chinks in the temple Wall.

Yesterday I played in a tennis tournament at the Winter Palace and carried off
Yesterday I played in a tennis tournament at the Winter Palace and carried off

a cup (the 1st Prize),- not by my own prowess but by that of my partner, a
a cup (the lst Prize),- not by my OWn prowess but by that of my partner, a

very nice Scotchman named MacNaugton who played a corking game. This afternoon
very nice Scotchman named MacNaughton Who played a corking game. wThis afiernoon

D. & I went over there again on invitation to watch a rather mild but quite
D. & I Went over there again on invitation to Watch a rather mild but quite

amusing gymkhana, and enjoyed ourselves immensely. And now I must turn in and
amusing gymkhana, and enjoyed ourselves immensely; And now I must turn in and

get some of that sleep that I seem to require more here than anywhere else in
get some of that sleep that I seem to require more here than anywhere else in

the world. I suppose now you cannot get that operation done till the Spring
the world.- I suppose now you cannot get that operation done till the Spring

vacation. I wonder if postponing it was wise. Oceans of love, dearest, from
vacation. I wonder if postponing it was wise. Oceans of love, dearest, from

Your Mim. West Bank at Luxor 31 January, 1913 Darling Gopher - We are now
Your Mim. West Bank at Luxor 31 January, 1913 Darling Gopher — . We are now

wondering whether Edith was allowed to return to New Haven for the Prom
wondering whether Edith was allOWed to return to New Haven for the Prom

proper. In a letter Doris had from Dick he said he had met you on the street
proper. In a letter Doris had from Dick he said he had met you on the street

and you had told him of your hopes and fears (though he didn’t put it that
and you had told him of your hopes and fears (though he didn't put it that

way.) I have a feeling that she did come back. I fancy Mrs. Finch likes now
way.) ‘I have a feeling that she did come back. I fancy Mrs. Finch likes now

and then to make a bluff at being very strict and keep people in suspense. I
and then to make a bluff at being very strict and keep people in suspense. I

shall await your description of the Prom with interest - and such patience as
shall await your description of the Prom with interest -4 and such patience as

I can summon to my aid. It’s two weeks since I’ve had a letter from you. I was
I can summon to my aid. It's two weeks since I've had a letter from you. I was

combined the advantages of a long-desired missive from a friend and a puzzle.
combined the advantages of a long—desired missive from a friend and a puzzle.

She writes one of the most indecipherable hands I’ve ever encountered. It
She writes one of the most indecipherable hands I've ever encountered. It

seems Put had a very serious accident in football and a time was in a
seems Put had a very serious accident in football and f a time was in a

dangerous condition. That was what first took her out there. Then she staid
dangerous condition. That Was what first took her outﬁ there. Then she staid

for Christmas, and now she is staying on through February just because she
for Christmas, and now she is staying 0n thrOUgf February just because she

likes it. Nothing particularly thrilling has happened since my last letter.
likes it. % Nothing particularly thrilling has happened since my last letter,

The chief destination of our rides for the past week has been our new digg at
The? chief destination of our rides for the past week has been our new diggf at

Medinet Habu which is much nearer than the old diggings at the Tombs of the
Medinet Habu Which is much nearer than the old diggings at the Tomb; of the

Kings. Doris and I rode over there yesterday afternoon to cheer Harry up a
Kings. Doris and I rode over there yesterday afternoon to cheej Harry up a

bit. He occasionally gets tired of not seeing a white pers to speak to for
bit. He occasionally gets tired of not seeing a white perm to speak to for

days at a time. I sat on a block of stone that had on been part of a temple
days at a time. I sat on a block of stone that hnd on< been part of a temple

pillar, and Doris wandered about picking up chun of carnelian, and my donkey
pillar, and Doris wandered about picking up Chun] of carnelian, and my donkey

boy took his clothes off - just why I cann say. Fortunately he put them on
boy took his clothes off - just why I cann( say. Fortunately he put them on

again. On leaving Harry to his diggi we rode up into a hollow in the Libyan
again. On leaving Harry to his diggiy we rode up into a hollow in the Libyan

Hills to see a temple we had not yet visited - a gem of a temple, called
Hills to see a temple we had noi yet visited - a gem of a temple, called

Der-el-Medineh. The view alon off towards the Nile though a wide cleft in the
Der-el—Medineh. The view n10n{ off towards the Nile through a Wide cleft in the

rocks was worth going far to see. And the superb looking Arab, guardian of the
rocks was worth going' far to see. And the superb looking Arab, guardian of the

place, was so moved by my present of seven cents that he knocked Mahmoud, my
place, wns 5. moved by my present of seven cents that he knocked Mahmoud, my

donkey b out of the way and held my donkey himself while I mounted. On our
donkey 1 out of the way and held my donkey himself while I mounted. On our

homeward way Doris left me on a mad gallop to catch up to a baby camel she
homy Ward way Doris left me on a mad gallop to catch up to a baby camel sht

saw in the distance. The maternal camel was not pleased by this attenion and
saw in the distance. The maternal camel Was not pleased by this atten- tion and

tried to take a bite out of Doris, but, happily, failed. I’ve been twice out
tried to take a bite out of Doris, but, happily, failed. I've been twice out

to luncheon this week - once with the Fahnestocks on their Dahabya "Cheops",
to luncheon this week - once with the Eahnestocks on their Dahabya "Cheops",

and once at the Winter Palace with the Piers. The Piers are enchanting people
and once at the Winter Palace with the Pier! The Piers are enchanting people

and so nice to us. They had Doris over for dinner and the dance again Tuesday
and so nice to us. They had Doris ovei for dinner and the dance again Tuesday

night. It is such a pleasure to her and I’m so thankful she can have it. The
night. It is such a pleasure h her and I'm so thankful she can have it. The

incessant cardplaying is rather hard on her. I tru to help out by playing
incessant cardplnying is rather hard on her. I tru to help out by playing

dominoes as much as I can; but Cousin T. so much prefers bridge. Give my
dominoes as much as" can; but Cousin T. so much prefers bridge. Give my

special love to Jack and tell him I live in hopes of finding t to answer his
special love to Jack and tell him I live in hopes of finding t to answer his

letter as it deserves. My love to Wilson Foss. And, dearest, to please me, bo
letter as it deserves. My love to Wilson Toss. And, dearest, to please me, b0

and call on Mrs. Baker. It isn’t decent not to when she has been so kind about
and call on Mrs. Baker. It isn't decent not to when she has_been so kind about

asking you there. I made a mistake in saying it had been two weeks since I had
asking you there. I made a mistake in saying it had been two weeks since I had

a letter from you. It’s only a little over one. God bless my boy. I have tim
a letter: from you. It's only a little over one. God bless my boy. I have tiq

of being very homesick for you. Your loving Mim. Luxor 8 February, 1913 
of being very homesick for you. Your loving Mim. Luxor % _ 8 February, 1913 .

Darling Gopher - Your letter of January 16th came two or three days ago with
Darling Gopher — Your letter of Jan 16th came tWO or three dnysé ago with

its accounts of the Prom. It was awfully nice for you, as well as for her,
its accounts of the Prom. It was awfully nice for you, as well as for her,

that Edith made such a hit. I judge from what you an others have written that
that Edith made such a hit. I judge from what YOU "é others have written that

this year’s Prom was more per-fervid than any that ever was before. It’s a
this year's Prom Was more per-fervid than ang that ever was before. It's a

pity to let it become an insane orgy - f that will eventually kill it. It was
pity to let it become an insane orgy - a; that will eventually kill it. It was

quite noble of you to write to me so soon and shen you were still so nearly
quite noﬂe of you to write to m' so soon and shen you were still so nearly

dead with fatigue. I enclos the order on the bank which you asked for, and I
dead with fatigue. I encloi the order on the bank which you asked for, and I

put in the P.S. just just to remind you not to absent-mindedly carry off the
put in the,P.S. justﬁ just to remind you not to absent—mindedly carry off the

On Wednesday Doris and I had one of the pleasant chocks of our lives when a
On Wednesday Doris nnd I had one of the pleasant checks of our lives When a

boat drew up beside the Beduin and deposited Mr. Dodge and Janet. None of our
bout drew up beside the Beduin and deposited Mr. Dodge and Janet. None of our

Cleveland letters had mentioned that they were coming abroad so it was an
Cleveland letters had mentioned that they Were coming nbro~d so it was an

absolute surprise. They had come up the river on the Rameses III, and left for
absolute surprise. They had come up the river on the Rameses III, and left for

Aswan the next day, but they are to be here for a week on their return. I went
Aswan the next day, but they are to be here for a week on their return. I went

over to the Rameses to call on Mrs. Dodge. I think she was quite cross because
over to the Rameses to call on Mrs. Dodge. I think she was quite cross because

neither Paige nor Howard Eells had written me they were coming. Tuesday Doris
neither Paige nor Howard Eells had Written me they were coming. Tuesday Doris

and I had a lovely time. Harry had invited us to come over to the valley so as
and I had a lovely time. Harry had invited us to come oveb to the valley so as

to show us the tomb of Horemheh and me the sarcophagus in Siphtah, and then to
to show us the tomb of Horemheh and me the sarcophagus in Siphtah, and then to

have luncheon with him at the House. We had breakfast an hour earlier than
have luncheon with him at the House. We had breakfast an hour earlier than

usual, and then started off on our donkeys with our donkey boys and a sailor
usual, and then started off on our donkeys with our donkey boys and a sailor

as escort, and Jones to follow us soon as he had got Cousin Theodore started
as escort, and Jones to follow us soon as he had got Cousin Theodore started

for the day. We rode along the river’s edge as far as the ferry landing place
for the day. We rode along the river's edge as far as the ferry landing place

directly opposite Luxor, before turning toward the Range. The ferry landing
directly opposits Luxor, before turning toward the Range. The ferry landing

that morning was worth going miles to see. Two steamers had come up the night
that morning was worth going miles to see. Two steamers had come up the night

before and scores upon scores of people and donkeys and sandcarts and
before and scores upon scores of people and donkeys and sandcarts and

carriages had come across to take some of the numerous expeditions on this
carriages had come across to take some of the numerous expeditions on this

side. The gay trappings of the donkeys, the blue and white clothes of the
side. The gay trappings of the donkeys, the blue and white clothes of the

donkey boys with a dash of red on their chests all made fine coloring; seven
donkey boys with a dash of red on their chests all made fine coloring; seven

native policemen in Khaki, with their cames waiting for them in the
native policemen in Khaki, with their cames Waiting for them in the

background, the bustle and confusion and everybody yelling at once - it was
background, the bustle and confusion and everybody yelling at once — it Was

all immensely entertaining to me. It was a perfectly delicious day, like all
all immensely entertaining to me. It was a perfectly delicious day, like all

our days, and I did enjoy the ride. The light and color on the Libyan Range as
our days, and I did enjoy the ride. The light and color on the Libyan Range as

we neared it were more marvellous than anything I’ve ever seen, -surpassingly
we neared it were more marvellous than anything I've ever seen, -surpassingly

beautiful, but so blinding we had to pull down our chiffon veils. The tombs
beautiful, but so blinding we had to pull down our chifon veils. The tombs

were intensely interesting, especially the paintings on the walls of Horemheh.
were intensely interesting, especially the paintings on the walls of Horemheh.

The unfinished part interested me even more than the beauty of the completed
The unfinished part interested me even more than the beauty of the completed

work;- it was just as thoug the artist - dead thousands of years ago - had
work;— it was just as thoug' the artist - dead thousands of years ago - had

laid down his pencil and brushes to go home to luncheon. Our luncheon at the
laid down his pencil and brushes to go home to luncheon. Our luncheon at the

House with Harry and Mr. Crane was a very jolly affair, and at three we
House with Harry and Mr. Crane was a very éolly affair7_and at three we

started for home, getting back at teatime and finding the dahabya seething
started for home, getting back at teatime and finding the dahabya seething

with people. One other day this week I was invited by the Contessa Contardone
with people. One other day this week I was invited by the Contessa Contardone

to go to Karnak with a small party, of whom the Russian Princess Gortschokoff
to go to Karnak with a small’party, of whom the Russian Princess Gortsohokoff

was one. Karnak is always one of the most wonderful places in the world, but
was one. VKarnak is always one of the most wonderful places in the world, but

that afternoon it was secondary in my eyes to the Princess with whom I fell
that afternoon it was secondary in my eyes to the Princess with whom I fell

madly in love. Think of a Princess - a real one - like those in novels and
madly in love. Think of a Princess - a real one — like those in novels and

storybooks; young, lithe, beautiful, fascinating, quiet and absolutely simple
storybooks; young, lithe, beautiful, ascinating, quiet and absolutely simple

in her manner. I couldn’t keep my eyes off her. We watched the workman
in her manner. I couldn't keep my eyes off her. We watched the workman

excavatin a large and beautiful jar and hoped it would be packed with jewels,
excavatin a large and beautiful jar and hoped it would be packed with jewels,

but when it was emptied nothing but a brick materialized. We paid a visit to
but when it Was emptied nothing but a brick materialized. We paid a visit to

the uncanny goddess Sekmet, she with the lion’s head. It is a life-sized
the uncanny goddess Sekmet, she with the lion's head. It is a life-sized

statue of black granite which stands in a dusky room in the temple of Ptah,
statue of black granite which stands in a dusky room in the temple of Ptah,

lighted only by a small square window high up in the roof. When you’ve looked
lighted only by a small square window high up in the roof. When you've looked

at the creature for five minutes she seems so alive that you sympathize with
at the creature for five minutes she seems so alive that you sympathize with

the Arabs who believe that she sometimes prowls forth and eats people. Endless
the Arabs who believe that she sometimes prowls forth and eats people. Endless

love, dearest, from Your Mim. I long to see you. I don’t know how I can wait
love, dearest, from Your Him. I long to see you. I don't know how I can wait

till June. Are you coming to any definite decision as to whether you will go
till June. Are you coming to any definite decision as to whether you will go

to Utah or not next summer? I had a letter from Mr. Walcott that shocked me
to Utah or not next summer? I had a letter from Mr. Walcott that shocked me

 He said that when Charlie was brought home in December they did not expect
7.? ,1 He said that when Charlie was brought home in December they did not expect

him to live more than six weeks; but that now there seemed a good chance of
him to live more than six weeks; but that now there seemed a“ good chance of

his recovery. My love to Jack and Wilson M. Luxor - 14 February 1913
his recovery. , My love to Jack and Wilson : M. ' Luxor - 1“ February, 1913

Darling Gopher - You are my best and only Valentine, and I wish you were here
Darling Gopher — You are my best and only Valentine, and I Wish you were here

or I were there to tell you so, viva voce. I have noth interesting to record
or I were there to tell you so, viva voce. I have not} interesting to record

this time of my personal doings because my whol week has been given up to
this time of my personal doings because my Whol week has been given up to

homesickness and rheumatism. I have suffe torments with sciatica or neuritis
ﬁomesickness and rheumatism. I have suffej torments with sciatica or neuritis

or some kindred of diabolical disease in my left leg; and I’ve not been off
or some kindred diabolical diseasg in my left leg: and I‘ve not been off

the boat since going to church last Sunday morning. To make matters worse the
the boat since going to church last Sunday morning. To make matters worse the

sun - the brilliant, constant, revivifying Egyptian sun - has withdrawn its
sun — the brilliant,i constant, revivifying Egyptian sun — has withdrawn its

light for two whole days, and it actually rained all day yesterday, resulting
light for two Whole days, and it actually rained all day yesterday, resulting

in t damp and cold and gloom on which rheumatism thrives. But I’m glad it not
in t} damp and cold and g100m on which rheumatism thrives. But I'm glad if not

Doris who is stricken down be her old enemy. If she had to bear in addition to
Doris who is stricken down be her old enemy. If she had to bear“ in addition to

her daily task of Bridge I think she’d go crazy. Day before yesterday when she
her daily task of Bridge I think she'd go crazy. Day before yesterday When she

came back from a morning across the ri at Luxor she announced that
came back from a morning across the ri\ at Luxor she announced that

Ex-President Diaz with a party of "greasy looking Mexicans" was tied up over
Ex—President Diaz with a party of "grensl looking Mexicans" was tied up over

there in a gorgeous dahabya. He must be glad he is here instead of in his
there in a gorgeous dnhnbya. He must be glad he is here instead of in his

war-tossed native land. Mr. J. P. Morgan is also tied up over there on his
War—tossed native land. ' Mr. J. P. Morgan is also tied up over there on his

boat, and rumor h it that the Great Man is as cross as two sticks (he may be
boat, and rumor h: it that the Great Man is as cross as two sticks (he may be

having a left leg, also) and making the lives of his guests a burden to them.
having a left leg, also) and making the lives of his guestsﬁa burden to them.

We expect to leave here March 1st for Aswan, and I presume we shall find
We expect to leave here March lst for Aswan, and I presume we shall find

ourselves in Cairo again about March 15th. Mr. Rudyard Kipling there now. I
ourselves in Cairo again about March 15th. Mr. Rudyard Kipling there now. I

hope my next communication to you will contain more thi The love I send you is
hope my next communication to you will contain more th The love I send you is

endless Your Mim. Friday, 21 February,1913 Best Beloved - Your letter of Jan.
endless Your Mim. Friday, 21 Iebruary,l913 Best Beloved — Your letter of Jan.

29 came on Wednesday. Jus three weeks after you wrote it. I certainly am very
29 came on Wednesday_ Jus three weeks after you wrote it. I certainly am very

far away, and I sometimes get frightfully homesick for you. I am still more or
far aWay, and I sometimes get frightfully homesick for you. I am still more or

less crippled form rheumatism, and it will be two weeks tomorrow since I
less crippled from rheumatism, and it will be two weeks tomorrow since I!

pleasure of riding my donkey. It makes me chafe to think of how muc I might
pleasure of riding my donkey. It makes me chafe to think of how mud I might

have seen in that time, and now our days here are numbered, as we start for
have seen in that time, and now our days here are numbered: as we start for

Aswan a week from tomorrow. I do hope the Romeyns will get here before then,
Aswan a week from tomorrow. I do hope the Romeyns w Will get here before then,

- or we may see them farther up the river. Last Monday I left the boat for the
— or we may see them farther up the riveﬁ Last Monday I left the boat for the

first time in eight days and the only to go across the river to see if
first time in eight days and thﬂ only to go across the river to see if

electricity would do my aching leg any good. Tuesday I went again for the same
electricity would do my achinﬁ leg any good. Tuesday I went again for the same

purpose and on my r found Newton Byers sitting on deck talking to the
purpose and on my ? found Newton Byers sitting on deck talking to the

Sister-Kitty! I w much more glad to see him than I’ve been before, and
Sister—Kitty! I % much more glad to see him than I've ever been before, and

Wednesday afternoon I went over to the steamer Rameses III and called on his
Wednesdaya afternoon I went over to the steamer aneses III and called on his

mother and sister. His mother is just a nice, plain mother, but his sister
mother and sister. His mother is just a nice, plain mother, but hif sister

struck me as something quite lovely and fine and rare, which opinion is
struck me as something quite lovely and fine and rare, Whicb opinion is

Just as I was leaving the boat, after calling, I had the thrill of seeing no
‘Just as I was leaving the boat, after calling, I had the thrill of seeing no

less a person than Rudyard Kipling, who was a fellow passenger of the Byers
less a person than Rudyard Kipling, who wns a fellow passenger of the Byers

family. Doris dined with the Byers that evening and went out to Karnak with
family. Doris dined with the Byers that evening and went out to Knrnuk with

them to see those matchless ruins by moonlight. The Byers said D. was a
them to see those matchless ruins by moonlight. The Byers said D. Was a

perfect godsend, because until that evening their son and brother had not
perfect godsend, because until that evening their son and brother had not

laughed since he left America. He told me he didn’t want to come at all - that
laughed since he left America. He told me he didn't Want to come at all - that

his family had dragged him. Yesterday I went over to lunch at the Luxor Hotel
his family had dragged him. Yesterday I went over to lunch at the Luxor Hotel

with the Contessa di Contardone di Villa Marina. You don’t have to call her
with the Contessa di Contardone di Villa Marina. You don‘t have to call her

all that - just Countess or Contessa. She is an Englishwoman who made the
all that — just Countess or Contessa. She is an Englishwoman who made the

mistake of her life in marrying an Italian, now haply dead, leaving her a
mistake of her life in marrying an Italian, now haply dead, leaving her a

widow for the second time. Her first husband was an Irishman named Jameson,
widow for the second time. Her first husband was an Irishman named Jameson,

who died while on an expedition into Central Africa with Stanley; and to hear
who died while on an expedition into Central Africa with tnnley; and to hear

her tell the story was a rare experience. She is a sister of Sir Mortimer
her tell the story was a rare experience. She is a sister of Sir Mortimer

Durand who was ambassador from England to Washington some time ago. She seems
Durand who was ambassador from England to Washington some time ago. She seems

to like Doris and me as much as we do her, - though Heaven knows she can’t
to like Doris and me as much as we do her, — though Heaven knows she can't

find us a hundredth part as interesting as we do her. ++++++++++ This is an
find us a hundredth part as interesting as we do her ++++++++++ This is an

extract form your grandmother’s last letter. If you stopped to think for one
extract from your grandmother's last letter. If you stopped to think for one

minute how such a breaches of ordinary good manners mortify me (actually to
minute how such breaches of ordinary good manners mortify me (actually to

the point of suffering) I’m sure you would not again neglect to acknowledge a
the point of suffering) I'm sure you Would not again neglect to acknowledge a

present or answer an invitation. Please write now to both Mother and Mabel.
present or answer an invitation. Please Write now to both Mother and Mabel.

The latter’s address is Mrs. H. W. Buttolph 404 E. 12th St. Indianapolis and
The latter's address is Mrs. H. W. Buttolph hOu E. 12th St. Indianapolis and

apologize as well as you can. Goodbye, dearest love. I enclose a picture of
apologize as well as you can. Goodbye, Dearest Love. I enclose a picture of

the Beduin in its gala dress of flags on Lincoln’s birthday. Your loving Mim
the Beduin in its gala dress of flags on Lincoln's Birthday. Your loving Mim

Luxor - 27 Feb. 1913 Best Beloved - Your letter of the 9th has just come and
Luxor - 27 Febo 1913 Rest Beloved — Your letter of the 9th has just come and

it made me weep - I feel so awfully about Crosson Hayes. What a perfectly
it made me weep —'I feel so awfully about Crosson Hayes. What a perfectly

dreadful thing to have happen. The thought of what he must have suffered
dread- ful thing to have happen. The thought of what he must.have suifered 

made me feel so sick I didn’t want any luncheon, and I’m so low in my mind I’m
made me feel so sick I didn't want any luncheon, and I'm so low in my mind I'm

afraid this wont be a cheerful letter. And now I want to explain why I’ve
afraid this wont be a cheerful letter. And now I Want to explain why I've

written so much more elaborate letters to Adeline than to you. I knew she was
written so much more elaborate letters to Adeline than to you. I knew she was

going to miss me more even than you, because she lives such a shut-in life
going to miss me more even than you, because she lives such a shut—in life

with so few distractions and almost no occupations; and so I have written
with so few distractions and almost no occupations; and so I have written

those letters to her as full and as well as my very limited leisure permitted.
those letters to her as full and as well as my very limited leisure permitted.

Then, too, I truly would not quite have dared to write such long screeds to
Then, too, I truly would not quite have dared to write such long screeds to

you for fear you wouldn’t read them. Very few young men have the patience to
you for fear you wouldn't read them. Very few young men have the patience to

read long letters. Edward Firth told me that he sometimes carried a letter
read long letters. Edward Firth told me that he sometimes carried a letter

from his mother for a week in his pocket without reading it. Of course I know
from his mother for a week in his packet without-reading it. Of course I know

 different from those of Edward and his mother. I’m very flattered that you
me different from those of Edward and his mother. I'm very flﬂttered that you

"had a wonderful time" reading all that manuscript in a bunch. I’m so very
"had a wonderful time" reading all that manuscript in a bunch. I'm so very

sorry you missed that lecture by Mr. Mercer, and I would love to have had you
sorry you missed that lecture by NP. NBrcer, and 1 would love to have had you

meet him. I never knew him myself, but Ed and Grace knew him, and were there
meet him. I never knew him myself, but Edy and Grace knew him, and were there

part of the time with him, if I’m not mistaken. I wish I knew whether the
part of the time With him, if I'm not mistaken. I wish I kneW'whether the

mines are paying and whether its Mrs. Twombly who is doing the mining now that
mines are paying and whether its Mrs. TwOmbly who is doing the mining now that

her husband is dead. The Milligan Mining Co. of which your uncle is President
her husband is dend The Milligan Mining Co. of which your uncle is President

is the "Keweenaw Land Association, and I only wish I had some stock in it.
is the I ' "Keweenaw Land Association, and I only Wish I had some stock in it

I’m still somewhat lame from my rheumatism, so that I’ve been on my donkey
I'm still someWhat lame from my rheumatism, so that I've been on m; donkey

only once in almost three weeks. That was last Monday and it started up the
only once in almost three weeks. That was last Monday and it started up the

pain in my leg again so that I’ve had to forego riding since. It makes me wild
pain in my leg again so that I've had to forego riding since. It makes me wild

to miss so much time and lose so many opportunities, but I’m glad but it’s I
to miss so much time and lose so many OPPOrtl nities, but I'm glad it's I

and not Doris - for the years have, as the ought, brought something of the
and not Doris - for the years have, as the ought, brought something of the

philosophical mind to me, and I don’t mi it as much as she would. She and
philosophic mind to me, and I don't mi it as much as she would. Shezand 

Cousin T. rode over to the diggings this afternoon and brought back
Cousin T. rode‘over to the diggings this afternoon and brought back

interesting news. Harry has been excavating a palace of Rameses III and has
interesting news. Harry has been ex- cavating a palace of Rameses III and has

found some very extraordinary windows (it was not supposed they had windows in
found some very extraordinarl windows (it was not supposed they had windows in

that period) and also a couple of bathrooms. I went for a long walk with a
that period) and alsc a couple of bathrooms. I went for a long walk with a

sailor to take care of me, - a little too long, for the home stretch through
sailor to take care of me, — a little too long, for the home stretch through

heavy sand was about all I could manage. Just before we arrived in Africa I
heavy sand was about all I could manage. [Just before we arrived in Africa I

said one day to Doris that I imagi we’d meet so many people we knew that the
said one day to Doris that I imagir we'd meet so many people we knew that the

Nile would be like Chapel St. She promptly bet me $5 that we wouldn't meet
Nile would be like Chapel Si She promptly bet me $5 that we wouldn't meet

more than three sets of people that we knew. She has lost, of course, more
more than three sets of people that we knew. She has lost, of course, more

than twice over. They’ve been quite thick recently. Saturday a.m. Doris and
than tWice over. They've been quite thick recently. Saturday a.m. Doris and

Janet Dodg cavorted about Karnak together, and in the afternoon I had the
Janet Dodg cavorted about Karnak together, and in the afternoon I had the

Dodge family to tea at the Winter Palace. Sunday after church I had a litt
Dodge family to tea at the Winter Palace. Sunday after church I had a litt]

chat with Mrs. Daniel Eaton of Sachem Street. Tuesday a.m. Mrs. Eaton came to
chat with Mrs. Daniel Eaton of Sachem Street. Tuesday a.m. Mrs. Eatox came to

call; Tuesday afternoon that nice Mr. Weston (you remember him first in
call; Tuesday afternoon that nice Mr. Weston (you remember hir first in

Newport and then in Paris) turned up; and that night at the at the Winter
Newport and then in Paris) turned up; and that night at that at the Winter

Palace Doris bostoned most of the evening with Newton B and saw the Romeyns.
Palace Doris bostoned most of the evening with Newton 8) and saw the Romeyns.

Wednesday I went over to call on the Romeyns, Mrs. R. must have been really
Wednesday I went over to call on the Romeyns, m Mrs. R. must have been really

glad to see me because she kissed me. left for Aswan the next morning, but
glad to see me because she kissed me. ' left for Aswan the next morning, but

we shall see them again in Cairo if not before. I took tea with Mr. Weston
we shall see them again in Cairo if not before. I took tea with Mr. Weston

Wednesday at the W. Palace. He asked a great deal about you and wanted me to
Wednesday at the W. Palac& He asked a great deal about you and wanted me tu

be sure to give you his warm regards. He has been a full-fledged Prof. at
be sure to give you his warm regards. He has been a full-fledged Prof. at

Williams for t years now. I had already written to Manson & Co. before your
Williams fOr U years now. I had already written to Manson & Co. before your

letter came asking them to send you a check for $125. If that isn’t enough to
letter came askingv them to send you a check for $125. If that isn't enough to

cover your Christmas expenses write me what I still owe you. We are off on
cover yom Christmas expenses write me what I still owe you. We are off on

Saturday for Aswan. Up to March 20 send letters as heretofore - Shepheard’s,
Saturday for ASWan. Up to March 20 send letters as : heretofore - Shepheard's,

Cairo. After that care Theo. M. Davis, Esq Messrs. Morgan, Harjes & Co. Paris,
Cairo. After that care Theo. M. Davis, ESQ Messrs. Morgan, Harjes & Co. Paris,

France. Please give Crosson Hays my love and tell him it is splended to hear
France. g Please give Crosson Hays my love and tell him it is splended to hearé

of courage like his. I think he is probably made of the same sort of stuff as
of courage like his. I think he is probably made of the same sort 0? stuff as

that superb Captain Oates in the South Pole party, who after suffering for
that superb Captain Oates in the South Pole party, who afte‘ suffering for